Wowsie wow, that is is awesome.
The ‘moving’ became a permanent feature of my life, going from university to various jobs in the UK, in Europe, and finally to the Asia-Pacific region and beyond, to a score of countries. I paused for a few extra years in the Philippines to complete a PhD in applied anthropology, but travelling and trekking anywhere I hadn’t been before became my practice when not actually working. Inevitably, ‘outsider’ status became permanent as well.
"The point about this is that as communists we will only support the bourgeois freedom movements in the colonial countries if these movements are really revolutionary and if their representatives are not opposed to us training and organising the peasantry in a revolutionary way. If that is no good, then the communists there also have a duty to fight against the reformist bourgeoisie, to which the heroes of the Second International also belong. There are already reformist parties in the colonial countries, and on occasion their representatives call themselves Social Democrats or Socialists."
It was in the river, yada yada, ooh wow, but it was their daily fucken' ablutions. After a minute of not being sure what the fuck, E@L refused to look let alone take any Kodak moment memories.
There was a gasp and then a rounded clap as Laura slapped Hayley with full force. It left a red stain on Hayley’s pale skin, but she hardly flinched at the contact.
While I did not get stuck working late at the office I did get stuck staying up late working on edits from the weekends photo shoots.
because I didn't invest what I needed to into the equipment.
So many years later, last year to be exact somehow this bereavement course tumbles at her feet. She finds herself learning the basics of grief and how to handle it.. And at the end of it when she was asked if they could utlise her services and the first case was in her village, she declined. For like the tortured man who haunted her earlier she knew her pathology well enough to know she would never shed the grief of others off – her inner watcher warned her off, and she declined.
(**P.S. - I apologize in advance for all the "!". For those readers that haven't followed me for very long, I'll warn you that I'm a cold-blooded creature that goes dormant in the winter and warm weather makes me very active.**)
If you the winner could e-mail you addresses your prizes will be in the mail asap!! Wishing you all a great evning and to those of you who didn't win - I will be hosting a new candy sooooooon!!!
Suddenly, two figures covered from head to toe in tight white uniforms, completely obscuring their sex and facial features, step forward and take her arms. Holding them out to each side, she strains in their harsh grasp and screams hysterically for them to let her go. The person sitting across the table from her leans forward, and she sees that it is her father, wearing black leather covering him to his neck. She cringes as he sneers and reaches forward quickly, grabbing hold of her loose tunic.
The Independent Complaints Directorate (ICD) in the Northern Cape has condemned the police at the Transvaal Road Police Station in Kimberley. This follows an incident in which a 19-year-old female detainee was repeatedly raped by four male detainees, who were locked up with her in a single cell.
Despite the fact that I won't hear from Rose State for more than a month...
3.circus of fear
You can recycle any box into a doll house! I had hoarded this box box for over a year and finally we made into a doll house!
I Could sleep Pow! -- right Now.
On a global scale, trends suggest that consumers are increasingly looking to understand where their food comes from and exactly what goes into it.
Also works well without the tahini.
I will update you when the new books are available, but until then you should just go buy a copy of Beehive Reader 1. : ) like… yesterday!
In fact, it was Ptolemy who, back in 2 A.D., came up with this
Dennis T. Avery of the Hudson Institute, reports CERN has demonstrated “that more cosmic rays do, indeed, create more clouds in the earth’s atmosphere.” Cosmic rays are subatomic particles from outer space. More clouds means that less of the sun’s warmth reaches the Earth’s surface.
and # 4 our future eternal life with Lord Yahushua. All of these meanings were more than likely familiar to the readers of this letter as they are to us today.
~S. Kaye Saunders
1 largest
So the Spartan Challenge is over and done and I’m left to get fit and lose weight by myself. I’ve learned a lot over the last 4 months though so I’m confident I can continue on as I have been. Before the Spartan Challenge completely finished I had one last thing to do…
I have to set this aside now for a while to let my brain cool off, but I have to say it looks like President Obama took the Republicans to the cleaners during the debt limit negotiations, and then he kept his mouth shut about it.
I'm not a follower of local news, per se. Simmon and Scarborough seem like the Abbott & Costello of NBC, in a good way. They should leave stay or leave the stage together.
Spin-doctors went into over-drive after the event to highlight the alleged violence against police and their property. The oldest trick in the book, employed for centuries by police and law enforcement agencies globally, when trying to control crowds in large rallies and marches is to use police operatives in plain or unidentified clothes to work as agents provocateurs to start trouble. Unless an independent, credible organisation reviews all the evidence, and makes a finding that the Bersih marchers were actually responsible for causing violence, I am not prepared to accept the police version. In any event, one must also consider their provocation and intimidation that resulted in such behaviour. The entire context must be taken into account.
Here's a bit from the into:
I spread my wings out and I could feel the wind running through them and then the laundry door slammed closed and dad was looking up at me.
Economic Slavery is an outflow of our current world/money system (Capitalism) Which create an environment with such economic discrepancies where you have a small percentage of the population with all the resources/money/power, where the majority is fighting and finding a way to just provide themselves with their basic survival requirements.
I never knew what to say when you cried, Kadie. It always hurt me to see you so sad. I reached out and took your hand; your cold hands in my warm ones. I don’t know how long we stayed like that but to me it seemed like forever. I didn’t move and neither did you. We just laid there until your tears slowed and you could talk again.
“Its not about need,” Her friend told her. “Its about love,”
Let me introduce Suzette - we're members of the same swingers' group.
- Absolutely NO PEEKING! :)
I don’t trust politicians who say that five paper copies of environmental reports are all that is required for a population of three hundred thousand. I don’t trust developers who think that sewage ponds are “natural wildlife habitat” and that they can safely manage the discharge of millions of kilos of liquid turds, urine and cleaning chemicals into the environment.
This whole "back to the grind" thing is pretty cool :)
Ownership is expected to transfer to SAH within two weeks.
However, I did need a little outlet for this weekend’s rage about comments by John Griffin of Addison Lee…
However, the information that a Blair team is operating both in KL and Astana certainly matches a clear pattern of developing links and relations between Malaysia and the former Soviet dictatorship in Khazakhstan.
When blood and water hit the ground
You loved her but that doesn't mean you can't move on,
GE Shipping Sells Its Single Hull VLCC 16
Not to mention it, but it's been warm around here. The daffodils are blooming, and New York was wandering around coatless yesterday. The wind was at proper strength, and the windows were open. It's Purim, the season of dressing as your opposite number, and getting so drunk that you can't tell the difference any which way between you and your worst enemy.
Sufficient to resolve
out his amber wings beside me. he cocked his head to spy me & i
my two collecting pots
That’s the kind of coach I’d want for my kids. – L.
Well I wasn’t physically robbed, just emotionally but I’ll get into that later. OH MY HELL, I only have 3 more class days left. I also have an Advanced Baking Competition and a final for that and a portfolio due. That’s it. Wow, I knew I’d finally get here but it’s getting so exciting now that I can see the end.
Gulp. Um...what?
Ask Tater about the hitting incident, and he’ll tell you that the boy pushed his friend first, and he didn’t like that, so he hit him. We talked about what else he could do instead of reacting like that, like go get a teacher, use your words. Blah blah.
So long as most of the personality traits I've come to know and love as his dad continue to shine through, I cannot take his life. That supposes of course he's able to eat, is ambulatory, and has normal body functions but that assumption can be made for most of the pet parents I know.
I honestly think foreign tourism in general is something that need work in Japan, although seeing Hong Kong and Macau, one wonders if those aren’t the best places to start the process.
But what will I actually be doing in Ghana?
Thank you for your love, your sense of humor, and your receding hairline. (Well, two out of three ain’t bad.) If one were to look back on your life, all they would need to see is the large, loving, and close-knit family that you’ve created to understand how successful your life has been. You are already missed, and are forever engrained into our hearts and memories. With all my love, I say goodbye.
The high-gravity Sticke Kölschbier turned-out okay. It's a good beer in its own right, but not one that I'd drink on a regular basis. I guess I'm more a fan of the taste of a normal-gravity Kölsch-style ale, with it's inherent clean/crisp body and taste, and the resultant refreshing quality of that style.
The interviewer may reveal a need for more information by putting an object in the mouth such as a pen or the tip of the eye glasses.
Second, the drop in new marijuana cases from 2010 to 2011 may be explained by the radical reduction in traffic stops by Austin PD during the same period. "Austin police officers made 179,882 motor vehicle stops in 2011 compared to 232,848 in 2010," according to the city's racial profiling report. That's just a guess - I don't know what proportion of marijuana cases originate at traffic stops - but it seems like a logical correlation. Moreover, the previous years had witnessed higher than usual numbers of traffic stops thanks in part to now-dwindling federal grant funds that paid for overtime for that purpose. It's possible, in other words, that the number of marijuana cases is a dependent variable subject to the vicissitudes of the number of traffic stops overall. What other theories can readers suggest that might explain the data?
Most people are focusing on the short term and how we as humans might have affected the change of a half a degree or so. The fact that global temperatures fluctuate on a much higher peaking sinusoidal wave with a longer wavelength means nothing to the typical homo sapiens. (For those of you who don’t know what a sinusoidal wave is, the simplification consists of the idea that temperatures go up higher and fall lower over a much longer period of time.)
So why did I name this Capertillars? Because I saw a caterpillar today and I was instantly upset.
So to this end I am going to focus more on Welsh beers this year on the blog.
I will not force myself to, but I really wanted to help,
Ryan McPartlin … Clutch Powers
Greyson definitely belongs to the "A-Team" !!!
He is not able to speak and as such is using note pages to write his thoughts and requests, some hand movements and other visual cues to communicate also.
The room I stay in is pretty large but the expanding body felt suffocated and wanted to break the wall to expand itself. This happened at 12:30 a.m. at night. Now it is 11a.m. in the morning. Though the suffocation is less, it is still there.
Although the children have been collecting wood and ‘anything else’ they can find, for the last month, when it comes to lighting the bonfires parents are on hand and the whole family and neighborhood come out to enjoy the festivities
I have tried several paint techniques lately...my favorite? white primer...yes..white primer..any kind...with two coats of brown paste wax on it...it gives the most soft, creamy aged look to things......and it's inexpensive...AND it's easy to get off if you don't like it! Hot Ammonia water takes it right off of anything! Yes...my other best friend...Ammonia...
“You’re a hard woman to fool.”
We are super excited to share another round of stamps from our witty, hilarious and just plain ol' adorable Bugaboo Line by artist Jodie Mackrell of Bugaboo Digi Stamps!
The bait co?pany’s h?ve made sure that they challenge ?s. They have created and recreated baits f?r each species, wat?r color, depth, ?eason and any condition that they believe we may encounter. They tempt ?s with more each year, b?gger, b?tter, m?re c?lorful. W? also know how diff?cult it has bec?me to s?rt through the rows and ro?s of p?astic ?nd rubber thing a ma jigs t? find th?t s?ecial ?ure that ?ays,
I used to play with these when I was little. Now my little brother plays with them. It would be a perfect Christmas gift! PICK ME...please.
Last Monday Betsy and I took a trip to the Smokies — a place we like to visit several times a year. We decided to drive the Roaring Fork Motor Trail behind Gatlinburg since it had been several years since we had driven that road.
I am not surprised that Baron got his start writing comic books. This is one of the most intensely visual stories I have read in a long time. Or, to be more specific, the climax is wildly, inventively, visual.
There is one consolation in being sick; and that is the possibility that you may recover to a better state than you were ever in before.
Sometimes our hearts get broken,
Note: You can only get 15% off a 50 business card order (if it’s your first one). For larger orders use the above link for 10% off entire order.
Deciding to cut our losses, we were making our way out of the stadium, when we encountered a girl perched at the entrance, shouting “Tickettsssss” in a highly practiced auctioneer voice. I stopped and took a good look at her. She was younger than me, maybe 19, and vaguely resembled Ruby Sue from National Lampoons Christmas Vacation. (Seriously. I think there may have been literal dirt on her cheeks.) I decided I liked her.
9 knowing this: that the law is not made for a righteous person, but for the lawless and insubordinate, for the ungodly and for sinners, forthe unholy and profane, for murderers of fathers and murderers of mothers, for manslayers, 10 for fornicators, for sodomites, for kidnappers, for liars, for perjurers, and if there is any other thing that is 3contrary to sound doctrine,
What the Moon Brings: Yet another in the increasing canon of Lovecraft's dreamy tales, this one is shorter and more pointless than others, but at least it gets points for its profusion of morbid imagery. Published in the May 1923 issue of The Amateur, after "Hypnos" but before "The Horror at Martin's Beach".
We need to have a coherent, proactive media strategy that works with how the media actually functions. Some media will accurately and intelligently report the facts, but the majority will not. We cannot continue simply putting out the facts and hoping that at some point the media will report them properly.
Spork
I love to write, and I happily pick up my pen every time. For me, writing is an adventure that I get to take every day. Normal people don’t go on adventures every day. I’ve been given a great gift, talent on loan from God, and I’ll be damned if I will waste it. I see book ideas everywhere, and I know that’s not just a coincidence. For the next 100 years, I’m pretty well set for book ideas…God, I better live for a hundred years cause I can’t write that many books in a lifetime, or maybe I will. Who Knows?
This issue is supposed to be highlighted long time ago, if I can recall it was before Eidul Fitr last year (2009) because I still remember I have voiced it out radically during discussion among my family members. But, what saddened me and of course a shame to lots of people when nobody is eager to talk about this issue especially the opposition leaders. Why? Don’t they are the one who are extremely fighting against corruption? Or do they think if this is related to their colleague, they are not suppose to comment?
Furniture is one of those things, years ago people made furniture from real wood, non of this laminated chip board stuff, and they used real carpentry to put things together, and not just a load of screws.
My latest project involves cubes decorated with green, red and gold, eventually spelling out " Merry Christmas" and decorated with all seven (yeah 7) of the new Make it Crafty Christmas Elves ! Aren't they just toooo darn cute??
The Year Without a Santa Claus ... ABC Family ... 12 PM
Christina
to write more stories and experiences and less about my stupid pants.
I just spent the loveliest three days out of town – in Bisbee, Arizona – and out of touch. I heartily recommend doing this a few times a year. Talk about the relaxing we CKDers are supposed to be doing! That’s also the reason for such a late blog today. We got home fifteen minutes ago, threw in the wash, threw out the garbage and here I am. Before we officially begin, I’ve got to say that I have been getting some really complimentary comments… in spam! I’ve mentioned before that I’m having a hard time separating the spam from the “real” comments, so if yours has not been responded to yet, kindly comment again but from a different email address, or don’t include your website address. One of those two actions should allow your comment through.
I will be gone this afternoon. Mrs. Jakubek will be my substitute.
“The ultimate measure of a man is not where he stands in moments of comfort and convenience, but where he stands at times of challenge and controversy.” – Martin Luther King, Jr.
carry me through.
Yet right now, my relationship with the one that I love very much sucks. Yes, it sucks! It sucks because I disappointed him, and then he disappointed me and now it apparently is over. You see? We both bought into that "You have to do ________(Fill in the blanks) to make me happy" mentality. In fact, because I didn't do ________, he wasn't happy with me and because he didn't respond to me like __________, after I explained why I didn't do _________ when he wanted me to ________, I wasn't happy with him.
His hypothesis is that lots of fish born in Lake Huron are coming over to feed in Lake Michigan.
you will have to
Last bit of tree, a few bags of debris, and I can think of going home, to a hot bath, and early to bed. Bliss.
Deuteronomy 31:6 Be strong and courageous. Do not fear or be in dread of them, for it is the LORD your God who goes with you. He will not leave you or forsake you.”
SONA Leak
where I believed the only safe place in
I was a little upset now!!! We had a group of ants around them. That was not a fun day!! :(
Weight Watchers PointsPlus = 5 per empanada
We are Austin Sunday 10:30 am – 11 am
have a good day my fellow blog friends, and when you get a case of the mondays, count a few of your blessings and grab a cold drink.
4) Table service at beer festivals is civilised
Mr FF has purchased some blogging app that he says will enable me to load photos, plus some device that will enable me to get them off my camera. Whether I will have the patience to learn how to use them is another matter altogether. I have finished my first pair of socks, never realised before now much yarn and nedles could raise your temperature, a few rows had me in a complete lather.
I know I’ve been ranting and raving about “margins” and taking the time to create “margins” of 30 minutes or more to give space to create. So it was in that mindset that I ran across this story (courtesy of Reader’s Digest via David Michalski) and thought – LOOK WHAT HAPPENS WHEN YOU DON’T HAVE MARGINS!!!!
Beowulf - I am hereby outing myself as a big-ass English major nerd. I love Beowulf. This is not Beowulf. What, Beowulf gets with Grendel's mother now? The hell? I don't care if she's Angelina Jolie, that ain't right. Plus, the 300-ized style looks awful. Does EVERYTHING have to be pillaged these days? Most of the moviegoing public probably doesn't even know a thing about Beowulf, so why not leave it the hell alone, or at least call it something else? It's not going to be another Lord of the Rings.
I'm only good for about ten minutes in a hot tub. I moved to the sauna for another ten minutes, then went back to the room to change. We met Brian and Nicole again for a trivia contest in one of the lounges, then went to the shore excursion desk and signed up for a tour in Cozumel. I don't remember what they did afterwards, but I decided it was time for a nap.
To the first objection, I'm going to have to disagree. I don't think Mr. Snyder cares that WBC says what they do. His objection is to the emotional trauma and harassment his family received from the WBC at his son's funeral. There I have to agree. A sign that says "God loves dead soldiers" can't be construed as anything other than harassment, particularly when directed at a captive audience, which mourners at a funeral are.
And it’s not just America. It’s happening in Europe, where the PTW are trying desperately to steer everyone into one of the controlling parties, but people aren’t buying it. Greece will have elections shortly, and you can bet things will get a thorough dusting off. France…ditto. In Egypt, they still aren’t done. As soon as it looks like the same old jerks are taking over again, the people get right back out on the streets. Syria. Iraq, Afghanistan. China. Vietnam. Indonesia. All over South America.
“If you get sick, you’re on your own. If you can’t afford college, you’re on your own. If you don’t like that some corporation is polluting your air or the air that your child breathes, then you’re on your own,” he said. “That’s not the America I believe in. It’s not the America you believe in.”
talents across the country to
Secret #1: You have to butter both sides of the sandwich before you put it on the panini press.
Margaret Ronald does a fine job writing the story but the plot didn’t capture me the way the first book did. I put it down a few times and didn’t really mind the gap. I’m not sure why I liked this book less since the writing is still of the same quality, but I just didn’t. Maybe it’s what she’s doing with Nate, maybe the plot wasn’t as interesting, maybe my expectations were too high…in any case, it’s still a good book but not one I’ll rave about. Sadness.
1. Take coconut ,ginger in a blender and blend it into a fine paste. If you are using frozen coconut then try adding 2-3 almonds to the coconut while blending this with give it the original flavor of a fresh coconut.
He is also highly regarded in the corporate sector.
The inquiry report is due back May 24, although it is not clear when it will be released to the public. The course cancellation and review were first reported by Wired magazine April 24.
“We’ve had a great response to these events in other markets and knew Austin would be the perfect place to host our next Fall Brew Fest,” said Shannon Wynne, owner of The Flying Saucer. “Cap’n Keith has chosen some great beers for this year’s event, a few of which aren’t available anywhere else in the Austin area. It’s an event beer lovers won’t want to miss!”
Serious. There’s a couple in front of me and an aunt and her nephew (if I got tha right….I want a Snickers ice cream bar. I already had two-but fuck it-i want one more. Fuck ill do 2.)
If anyone in these schools within my city have ever seen someone that they love and/or care about have Anaphylaxis, then I know that they would be behind me on this. It’s not something I take pleasure in seeing. Because, my daughter’s airway is compromised, as are all of her major internal organs. And yes, they CAN swell. Not just the outside of your body. Your insides take a beating, too. To watch your child fight for air, with fear in her eyes, barely being able to talk because her tongue is swelling more and more, along with her windpipe, it is truly one of a parent’s nightmares that you never think will happen until it does.
Okay so, today was probably the best day of my life, to put it plainly. I'll tell you why.
Things have been quiet the past week at the Cleaning Service. Some of it is because I decided to cut back my posting schedule a bit. But the other factor is that I'm switching off from running D&D to Pendragon for a while to see how we like it. In case you're not aware, Pendragon was written by Greg Stafford (the Runequest designer) and is based around the mythos and "history" of Arthurian Britain.
A reading from ‘The Five Feasts of the Child Jesus’, by Saint Bonaventure.
Educating future women leaders
It happened: And his sons came from the drinking house, they said to him: We did not recite the Shma’, he said to them: If the dawn still has not risen, you are obliged to recite.
as we talk
Today was the 70.Birthday of my sons´ grandmother.
Republicans, in floor debate, said the state should not be delving so deeply into people's private lives and that the data collected is not likely to be accurate because of hesitancy in reporting sexuality.
Genital warts are not something that you want to have. They are a serious sexually transmitted disease that is hard to deal with. The human papilloma virus otherwise known as HPV causes this disease. This virus looks like bumps that resemble warts.
R. M. Ridley writes in the genre of Fantasy and Horror though the line between the two often gets blurred.
Has the Green Party lost the plot?
Other new technology will include BMW's latest design language and aims to improve on all areas, focusing on efficiency, technology and design detailing of the bmw service center california if the bmw service center california at speed. It all helps the bmw service center california and emissions based taxation. The 316d is the bmw service center california and the bmw service center california. The six-speed manual and the bmw service center california a 2.0-litre four-cylinder diesel. The difference is that both are quick, though the bmw service center california to BMW's profitability that's perhaps not a bad case of the bmw service center california in is open to debate but with rapid recharging and no harmful emissions.
Notes: The faux consolation of this quote translates into real life. Try it on your significant other!
3. Plug in your iPhone, iPad or iPod Touch via USB. At this point the program should auto detect the device and give you an explorer like interface showing you all the files and directories on the device.
Please note that I may or may not have consumed copious amounts of vodka cocktails whilst compiling this handy dandy list of fun things to do in honor of the Royal Wedding. You may or may not want to do the same should you so choose to play along. It is totally up to you. But anyhoo, without further adieu let’s get this party started:
I started looking for You
Personally, I think it was simply hearing, "Happy Mother's Day Mummy" repeatedly delivered by the very person who qualified me to enjoy it all in the first place.
“TESTED” - Friday, October 8 at 10/9C
So hopefully I’ll be able to spend a bit more time here now. Thanks to all who’ve dropped by in the slow down , much love to you all
We reforest what we clear
Says Lisa.
The description says:
* Hold On (1977; peaked at #61)
Tolerance.
Are you walking with Him? Is there any sin that stands between you and God? Have you allowed God into every area of your life to dwell and purify?
20.DAG NASTY "Circles"
Hope Solo eliminated from DWTS last night.
Borders
There was a long line of people waiting to get in at the Embassy of Indonesia, so it took us a while to get in. As we walked in, we heard the Indonesian music. Unfortunately, we walked into the Indonesian Embassy towards the end of the performance. We literally heard the last 2 minutes of the performance. Ah, what a teaser! I wanted to listen to the beautiful music of Indonesia!!! I guess I just have to wait. My older daughter had a chance to touch the instrument. The building of the Indonesian Embassy, which could be a museum, was absolutely gorgeous. I never expected the Embassy to be this stunning looking. We all were just mesmerized.
(There is a guest wearing a t-shirt that has an outline of the Great Lakes on it.)
I have seriously been so busy with school! I have been studying like crazy and it never seems to be enough. I don't know whats wrong with me. UGH...maybe its my teacher. Have I mentioned she isn't very good?
Hoy.
“Oh, God,” Lia said. The memorial to her family should have been macabre. Instead, it brought tears to her eyes. Even the antique desk her sister, Sylvie, had thrown a fit to own and then despised when computers became popular and her father wouldn’t let her buy a more functional desk had a place
Tutors, mentors and peer groups are likely to advise an unknown author to stay within the genre rules. I did try and write within a genre - two action adventure novels. Unfortunately I was belly prone on the authorial learning curve and the results were quite deplorable. When I found a voice the genre rules had been thrown to the wind and writing became a true joy. But the result didn't fit a pigeonhole.
3-1/2 tablespoons, olive oil, divided, plus more
Lately, the word "check' has become one of the most important words in my personal lexicon. I am task oriented—I can spend time dreaming big or small, and I can think abstractly as long as there aren't too many visual distractions to turn my head, but where I really shine is when I am faced with a list of tasks to complete.
*4*
Phreak: Now I have enough gold to finish my Trinity Force.
Line roasting pan with parchment paper.
Better to be safe than sorry, right?
Join us and make your voices heard!
The U.S. Constitution does not mention the concept of a first lady or the job of the president’s wife. The first lady’s role is the result of cultural expectations, not legal prescriptions. Whoever becomes the next first lady will have a remarkable position to influence others. She will do herself a favor to be herself in that role, to take the role and adapt it to her interests. The same is true for every woman. Whether you prefer to wear a strand of priceless pearls or a string of glass beads, God has created you with matchless talents and abilities. Plus, he’s given you a unique circle of influence in which to use them.
* withhold approval, appreciation, or affection
While being at Bible college we learn so much about looking into what the Bible is saying by looking around the surrounding context such as the time of it being written, the people who were being written to and basically the way that society functioned at that time.
In edition to the crochet book, I bought two more Japanese books, purely for eye candy and inspiration! They are part of a 'Mook' (magazine/book) collection called Editions de Paris.
The next few days were filled with funeral planning, etc. It was stressful, expensive and absolutely exhausting. But, the service was beautiful. He was creamated, so there was no casket, just a box of ashes and three roses (one for each of his three daughters). I wrote a poem, but couldn’t read it so the officient did on my behalf. The rest is a bit of a blur…
Fielding
My cup of tea.
This is another OJ but this time, the New York Times is failing to lead the two-step of the racial narrative. Sorry, all you verminous little reality reversers at Amerika's newspaper of record, your Lies are too easy to see through this time. (The arrogance of the Diversity Komissars of 42nd Street, thinking they can continue to spew a ridiculous storyline despite its total absence of plausibility, and especially, in light of a growing consortium of free-thinking people now getting their news from the internet and alternative sites like this one).
In my rattled brain, I have divided my procrastination into two events: Medical Stuff, and Everything Else. The Medical Stuff is the easier category to rationalize. The kind folks in my office gave me two maternity leaves in 11 months, and therefore I have tried to keep all other absences to an absolute minimum. This work ethic guilt has made it tough to schedule any other doctor appointments, even though I’m well overdue for the following.
Kid: Watching over us?
I just finished this novel the other day, and I'm still basking in the afterglow. I'm a little ticked I got it on my Kindle, because while I love the convenience of just grabbing the e-book in an instant, I would love to own the hardcover. I wouldn't call this cover beautiful, or shiny, and I wouldn't squee over it, but I do think it's compelling, and incredibly apt.
202-649-2716
'Tis a puzzle
In Subliminal: How Your Unconscious Mind Rules Your Behavior (Pantheon), Cal Tech physician Leonard Mlodinow (he of The Drunkard's Walk) gets a little into brain science, examining how we misperceive our relationships, and misremember events. Do we actually categorize people by the animals they resemble?
This is not the version I have of this song, but Keller Williams isn't that popular of a mainstream musician, and so I couldn't find a better version that I liked.
Stir again before serving,
Now, even though he won’t say it, I think he is doubly mad at me. First, because I won’t have sex with him. (That is only for my own protection.) And second, because I won’t give him any money. Is that for my own protection, too? Is that not being an enabler? Or is that being stubborn and selfish?
Well that’s all I have for today. Did not get my daily dose of endorphin.
"My son is in a mainstream class. He goes to other kids' birthday parties," says Jean Lewis. She is the mother of an autistic 12-year-old and also a director of a B.C. parents' lobby group. Where would her son be without treatment? "He wouldn't be living at home," she says. "Without treatment, kids like this are usually institutionalized by the time they're adolescents. They're living in restraints, living in diapers. They have to have their teeth removed because they bite."
Issue 263 of Doctor Who Adventures magazine is on sale from today at all good newsagents until 11th April priced £2.50 per copy.
How Does Genre Affect Voice?
Jailed marijuana activist Marc Emery is all over the map politically. A founding member of the Marijuana Party of Canada, he’s moved his support between the B.C. and federal NDP, the federal and provincial Greens and federal Liberals over the years.
What if Optimum Doesn’t Have Service in Brooklyn, NY?
A small garden harvest for that night's dinner.
Preheat oven to 375° F. Rub the bottom of a shallow baking dish or loaf pan with oil. Place mixture onto baking dish and shape into a rectangle. Level the top (for even cooking). Add 1/2 T ketchup to coat the top, then bake, approximately 45 minutes.
The commission also said that there could be no healing without truth, that half-truths and denial were no basis for building the new South Africa, that reconciliation based on falsehood would not last, and that selective recollection of past violence would easily provide the mobilisation for further conflict in the future. If these are its criteria for the role of truth in promoting reconciliation, it has failed to meet them.
After explaining to the customer service person that we had to leave the area the next morning, I asked him if he was absolutely sure the cable they identified was all that was needed to fix the issue. He assured me that it was and they would annotate the part number on the repair ticket so we could refer to the part number later. So we sat around for another hour while they finally did the oil change and put the Autopark brake system back together. It was about 1:30 PM when we paid the bill and left.
As mentioned above, ‘Valtari’ is quite a departure for Sigur Rós’, yet much in the
(I am in awe of and love these women),
G'day to you!
First real snow of the season here in this corner of Southern Ontario, also the first day I actually shovelled though could likely have left it to melt. Unfortunately our driveway is a little like the secret garden and never seems to get any sun.
I chose to use TGF's Flutter Anya. I haven't used this stamp very much so thought I'd give her some attention. I've been trying to use stamps that I haven't even inked up yet before buying even more stamps. My hubby said this card looked very busy. I guess he is a clean and simple kind of card guy but sometimes I like to really embellish my cards.
You can use the good old pay-per-click to point directly to your music to increase sales.
It was 8:30 and time to enter the molloca to begin our second ceremony with Ayahuasca. I had feelings of good camaraderie and joy mixed with a real sense of anticipatory nerves as I found my small chair.
Offshore Company
He said the stranger had confused him to the point where he didn’t know if he was being held captive to be killed or regarded as a guest to be wined and dined. He appeared quite confused when he was walked into the police department. He appeared in excellent health, though a little shaken and confused.
Lift the carcass to your ear, imagine you hear the sea, across which the hero attempts home. At this distance, who remembers the names of the crew, or M's siberian jailers?
The papers are from Recollections Charming stack and a Cardstock Warehouse Paper Co. Pound o' Paper. There is some seriously high quality card stock in that pound pack. I kept going with the scraps I was kicking up, too. I still need to add sentiments to these and I have two more car stickers to create with. The striped paper is from DCWV's Lodge stack.
If you went with “A,” you’re with me. After Joe Shuster burnt the first draft of Superman, Siegel approached comic strip artist Russell Keaton to illustrate a rewrite. The script resembles what would become Action Comics #1, only instead of Krypton exploding, Earth “was in its last days, dying” as “the last man placed his infant babe within a small time-machine” and launched it to “the primitive year, 1935, A.D.” The child’s “physical structure was millions of years advanced.” The Man of Tomorrow was literally the man of tomorrow.
2 three
Add the wet ingredients into flour mixture, stir until well incorporated.
You honor the accomplishments of others while neglecting, even hiding your own.
But, with Martha, his writing seemed to hit the mark more. And even more so with Donna. Or in the case of Midnight, without Donna…
when I was an exchange student in Germany.
All of this implies that ancestral European women faced a competitive mate market. At higher latitudes, too many women had to compete for too few men, especially among hunter-gatherers. On the one hand, hunting distances were longer on average, thus increasing male mortality. On the other, men were less polygynous because of the higher costs of provisioning women and their offspring, especially during winter. This excess of females over males in the mate market was greatest on the continental steppe-tundra that covered most of Europe during the last ice age. Northern Asia also had steppe-tundra, but only in arid regions farther north where human occupation was not continuous,
Oh! What did Mom want for her 90th birthday you ask? An ipad! Intellect marvelously intact, she is ready to make her run at the century mark.
By now I was so near to the animal barns that I could hear the sheep baa-ing and the alpacas whistling! Wandering through the animal barns and visiting the owner's booths is another joy of this particular fair. I always look for handspun yarns that are labeled with the names of the 'real owners' - the animals themselves!!
1/2 stick butter, melted
3+ patterned papers
The downside to all this beauty is the standard it sets. You can’t bum around in your pj’s in Paris. If you dare take a stroll in your workout shoes, be ready for some odd looks. Looks that in no uncertain terms inform you that you’re below the bar. You’re not even level with the ground on which that bar is perched. Oh, no. You’re sunk deep in the layers beneath the Earth’s crust, swimming in a molten fashion hell, and you should probably be set aflame for your faux pas.
I know, LOTS of women choose no epidural.
Peeved: Macy’s.
ME: NO!
Ladies, if you have been through a similar situation, I would love to get your feedback and how you handled it.
“What if building the RIGHT church depends on using all the WRONG people? This is a question that is found on the back cover the new book, A Radical Idea, by pastor and bestselling author David Platt. But first a few words about Pastor Platt. He is an incredibly gifted expositor/preacher of the Word. I have heard him preach by visiting his church website and watching the videos of his messages. Right now I am listening to his series on Matthew and it is powerfully convincing of just who the person of Jesus Christ and it is also very convicting in that the Holy Spirit uses the messages to speak to my heart and to my relationship with Jesus Christ. And when it comes to radical he is to be numbered among the few and far between in our world who can be defined by the word “radical” because that he is…but in a very good and godly way. It’s like the saying, “You just have to be there,” to understand. Well, you just have to read his books Radical and the Radical Experiment as well as listen to him preach to fully understand what I mean by my referring to him as “radical.” And we as believers should all be so “radical” in our faith.
In short, this blog is not about style, nor is it about clothes. Yes it’s about fashion, but it’s from a very specific angle that I believe is one of the most exciting and inspiring in our industry today.
rejoice in the stillness, the silence.
“I sing praises to those whose hearts accept the universal order, which only appears to be chaotic and ever-changing. In actuality, everything is designed down to the smallest detail, to be in perfect operation. The dance of the universe is a happy one, with energy swirling and twirling in a never-ending celebration to life itself. Join this dance, dear one, and enjoy the remarkable journey of the weaving of the story of your life. Do not fear what appears to be a change or a loss. It’s only the transitioning orbit of energy interplaying with you and your loved ones. Embrace it as evidence that you’re alive! Embrace your deepest emotions as a signal of your true human essence!”
“Hey, look! It’s the hopeless romantic!” shouted one of the bullies you were bullied by. You didn’t seem to mind at all.
More on the egg donating another day...I have to write a paragraph that can be read by the child/children I may help to conceive when they are 18 years old...HELP!
“Therefore by the deeds of the law there shall no flesh be justified in his sight: for by the law is the knowledge of sin. But now the righteousness of God without the law is manifested, being witnessed by the law and the prophets; even the righteousness of God which is by faith of Jesus Christ unto all and upon all them that believe.” Romans 3:20-22
but maybe as simple as the dove that flew by you the other day.
While we were in Asheville, North Carolina, for Betsy’s birthday last month, we drove up to Mount Mitchell, the highest peak east of the Mississippi River. We’ve been there before, and always enjoyed the view.
“WHERE IS MY YARDSTICK????????”, he bellowed.
This is God’s revelation to us that the church’s assets do not reside in banks but in the powerful name of Christ and every spiritual blessing in heavenly places that is ours now! Ephesians 1:3.
3. Be Free (White, Argent) 3:52
Current singing sensation Lady GaGa derived her name from the single “Radio Ga Ga”.
Now emboldened I head for the Merrion Hotel. Towards the steps I walk and nodding at the doormen I make my way up the steps and into the main foyer where I am greeted by a younger concierge.
As usual, we have used random.org to fairly select a random winner. It opted for number 29, making our winner:
And whatever happened to being self-taught,
Dennis also sent me another Koufax:
Supports extending the payroll tax cuts benefitting the Middle Class funded by putting another 200,000-plus mostly middle class Americans out of work and freezing wages of the remaining mostly middle class Federal employees. YES
One particularly interesting event occurred when I was eight. As a kid, I was always climbing trees, poles, and literally hanging around upside down from the rafters of our lake house. So, it came to no surprise for my dad to find me at the top of a 30-foot tree swinging back and forth. My little eight-year-old brain didn’t realize the tree could break or I could get hurt. I just thought it was fun to be up so high.
Destined to inherit the riches of his family, George would become a hapless young man with no ambition and even less intelligence, devoid of the gumption that inhabited his youth. For as a boy he was quite the devious little fellow. A little spoilt and more than a little cunning. Infuriated that Georgiana would girly up the nursery with her fluff and bother, he would set to work to put it right.. A man's world he would create. A world where pirates were aplenty and dollies should hide in their silly little houses lest some wicked pirate were to capture them quickly, cut off their heads and use their locks of hair to tie up the mainsail. Captain Cordoba would keep watch from the chair and alert George of the approaching enemy. Yes a pirate's life seemed just right for little George and justly so a beastly pirate should have beastly pirate things to play with.
chilled, you look up to heaven's theater
He said Pakatan, if it is elected to be the next government, would provide a fixed sum every year for all schools, including Chinese and Mission schools in Sarawak to ensure that they are well-equipped and provided with electricity and water.
or perhaps the worst day imaginable...
There you have it, all that a holiday season should have:
car wax
- Bracket Frame Die
Usually once the tamil astrology free is laid, the tamil astrology free are planets, signs, houses and aspects. Once your wheel is set and visible, you will totally benefit from the tamil astrology free, which means star; and logos, meaning 'word', we can continue from where these concepts came, etc. If we continue to manifest thus, probably with heavier consequences as the tamil astrology free be taken into account too.
Patek Philippe watches could be the probably the most high-priced look at on this planet. This is the good fortune look at that is bequeathed to 1 and also the body's rich if the look at comes. Maybe you have witnessed one such different watches in advance of? This look at is designed by the most effective look at makers in Physical exercise. This timpiece was first announced in 1932 and so, this watch still is building dunes in price tag and status. Don't dismay in regards to the price tag since it is probably the most affordable in relation to Patek Philippe different watches. Most of these different watches from Patek Philippe is often computerized or perhaps guidebook in relation to their action plus you will find the quarta movement types as well this is why you have the deluxe of selecting the main one you desire.
1. What is your favorite meal to prepare at home? I love trying new recipes, so I guess my favorite meal would be one that I haven’t ever made yet. If pressed to give you something that I’ve made before, I’d have to say my version of Hungry Girl’s 10-Alarm Crockpot Chili. I’ve made it TONS of times, winter or summer. It makes so much and it’s really easy. Love, love, love.
Gabriel took on IKEA like a champ!! He put up with my browsing and oohing and ahhing for hours without a peep! He actually kinda got into it with me. He would find something he liked and point at it excitedly and go "Ooh!" or "Oh! Wow!" Hahaha--crazy kid. He was pooped by the time we left though! He conked right out in the car on the way home....
Underground
Pats and Bex will be appearing at the following venues throughout the UK singing some Waking the Witch songs, as well as material from the new albums.
Israel lobby harness Judeo-Christianity
And have I told you? I love ye all! I've taken 4 books from library, and hopes to perform a much required CPR on my other blog. I know it's probably too late, but perhaps a miracle will help?
Your experience led me to think of something I read quite a while ago.
Riddle Question: Where does a fish keep its money?
Crikey, I remember back in grade school when I thought my non-Catholic (but still Christian) friends couldn’t go to heaven with me and I cried and cried. That’s what the nuns taught us, and we all bought it hook, line and sinker. I think that is why some people think the Catholic church is like a cult. I am proud to be a Catholic, but don’t buy into 100% of their doctrine. Which they change. More than once. Confusing. Also they don’t aways practice what they preach. What?!?! you may say. Think about the cover up with priests/boys. Enough said. Moving on.
Realize that there are always multiple realities that are available to manifest. These other realities will respond to you and the collective frequencies that are offered. As more and more individuals own the awareness and offer the vibrations of love, joy, gratitude and appreciation as well as forgiveness it will call forth the reality in which all people are honored, healed and loved.
Below is a list of the great designers that will also be hopping today. Be sure to check out their awesome projects.
I wish you happy, happy, days! You will have some bad days, yes. They are important so you can appreciate the good ones.
Overall, I think mode is a really interesting area of language to look at and one that allows you to open up texts for really careful scrutiny. It helps if you can combine discussing it with other ideas about the texts' contexts - very much as Marcello Giovanelli explained at the recent EMC Language conference - but it's also something that can be linked neatly to specific language features for AO1:
Luv Eileen xxx
This massive spate is roughly equivalent to seventy times its low season discharge, and brings with it huge quantities of silt. These have literally provided the building blocks of downstream Nilotic societies for millennia.
(9) For Jerome, it was important that the Bible should be available in the official language of the Roman Empire. The fall of the Roman Empire in the fifth century did not, however, lead to the end of Latin as an international language. If anything, Latin became increasingly important as time progressed, and was well placed to become the language of scholarship and diplomacy when the so-called “Dark Ages” finally lifted over Europe around the year 1000.
I expect once the e-book-reader technology settles down it will become popular with academics. I’m personally looking forward to that.
This smacks of ignorance , or at the very least a lack of understanding.
Mark L. Charette, 38, Millburn, N.J.
R. Chetwynd-Hayes -The Ghouls
and i find there is quite a bit of frustration that accompanies this travel. although, honestly? most of this frustration is not at my toddler.
The other side!
I toyed with the idea of taking one home to nurse back to health, but since Tucker was rabidly running through the yard searching for more bunnies, I decided that would most likely mean certain bunny heaven for that unfortunate one. We were all slightly disturbed from this nature channel moment, and none of the smaller kids found out about it. It was quite the feat to keep them inside during the rescue; we didn't want to scare them or open the floodgates of "why?" questions.
Like any young man, he also has dreams to be married, but his parents say there is no room in the house for another young family.
I saw one of my idols in concert (for the second time) and I’ve even been partying with him! Loke Nyberg, a swedish troubadour, his amazing lyrics are inspiring, thoughtful and just plain amazing. The music is catching and fetching, you really have to listen. Loke himself is a huge personality, friendly, fun and very kind.
Many great artists are able to conceptualize their own insular universe over the course of an album. The Stooges inspire dread and nihilistic abandon. My Bloody Valentine’s Loveless embedded you in the middle of a kaleidoscope of feedback. Michael Hurley whisks you off to a crowded campfire where the bottles are quickly drained and the bowl is slowly passed. Cass McCombs’ A isn’t quite a card carrying member of that hallowed crew, but it does inspire a lonely and lost vibe that makes you want to wear pajamas and draw the blinds on the sunniest of days. However, there is a sunny undercurrent that drags it above a self-destructive slog through the depths of depression. It’s one of the first things I reach for on those days where life should go absolutely nowhere for an hour and my hectic existence reaches a much needed standstill. It achieves stasis as it balances majesty and melancholy perfectly on the scales of my mind.
The first society was organized on February 2, 1881. (See Francis E. Clark. Christian Endeavor in all Lands. Boston, MA: The United Society of Christian Endeavor, 1886, pp. 35, 41, 621).
1. The United Nations should organize a Nuclear Security Summit to take up the crucial problem of the Fukushima Daiichi Unit 4 spent nuclear fuel pool.
of change like scattered temptations
I don't even know how I was able to finish this layout. I had to work 3 days this week (as opposed to the usual two days) and spent another day in Manhattan with Melissa and Angelo for his oncology check-up. In any event, I just finished putting it together and I'm still on the fence. You know me, I either love it or I hate it, but not quite sure about this one.
Level 13: MP Cost: 38, Duration: 138 seconds, Damage: +26%, Critical Rate: +15%, Minimum Critical Damage: +7%, Attacks up to 1 enemy.
Our theme for the next fortnight is "I love you Mom".
The two journalists noted that with the Mozambican town Ressano Garcia (above) now moving ever-closer to the unpatrolled South African/Mozambican border fence, the ferocious uniformed gang calling themselves “the Ninjas” has turned this town together with the Lebombo Mountains into their main area of operations, conducting an increasingly vicious reign of terror. They often use swords to kill their victims: preferably by decapitation.
I grabbed the new Better Homes and Gardens Sew Scrappy magazine, a layer cake and background fabric of Count Down to Christmas by Sweetwater for Moda. Need it for some of my Christmas giftees! :-)
And anyone who doesn’t want unlimited, unconstrained government can see that. Sadly, it seems that the idea of unlimited, unconstrained government is quite popular in some quarters… even with some supreme court justices.
Firm tofu - 1 cup, cut into cubes
Sigh. To summarise. Through the last week in April Penny and I were in the midst of yet another difference of opinion. This time it ws around whether to post member numbers on a cumulative or absolute basis.
truly ultimate, indeed!
PUTAR: It was said that the water sprinklers arrived in record time to clean up the area soon after the assassination.
in its rhyme with galley. The actual pronunciation for Edmond
Example 1 of passive vision: The weather is freezing.
Asian Sunset by Sonny (parents with a sense of humour) Rainshine
As this card is relatively CAS with a fair bit of 'white space', I wanted a bit of interest in the card stock base itself so chose this one with a textured weave which fortunately is on both sides of the card. I say fortunately as I wanted it to show on the inside of the card too but whether or not you can actually see the texture is another thing of course. Mind you, I have had to get a new camera after the sad demise of my own before Christmas. I had borrowed my daughter's for the last couple of cards but couldn't really keep doing so. Hence the new camera & I don't know my way around it yet. The image you might recognise as being from Mo Manning (and I have actually used this at least 3 or 4 times before - but I like it! LOL) He is called 'Georgie Cartwheel' & I coloured him with Promarkers to match the single dp I have used on the front as well as the inside of the card. I cut myself a few circles of card to match the dp & layered them up - one of which features a circular 'hello' sentiment I acquired once from My Grafico.
It looks as if we’re stuck with it
Running it as an RPG, it is the ultimate lazy-DM's game. At any time you can kind of let the game play itself and it will generate challenges and situations and then, when the mood or situation strikes you, you can dive right back into full DM mode and run with it. I CANNOT SAY ENOUGH GOOD THINGS ABOUT IT!!!!!
ROMNEY: First of all, my investments are not made by me. My investments for the last 10 years have been in a blind trust, managed by a trustee. Secondly, the investments that they’ve made, we’ve learned about this as we made our financial disclosure, have been in mutual funds and bonds. I don’t own stock in either Fannie Mae or Freddie Mac. There are bonds that the investor has held through mutual funds. And Mr. Speaker, I know that sounds like an enormous revelation, but have you checked your own investments? You also have investments through mutual funds that also invest in Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac.
Yesterday, as a show of solidarity for Palestinian refugees’ right of return, thousands of Palestinians and Israelis marched from Abu Sinan, passed through Kwikat, and arrived at Amqa. These villages, casualties of the 1948 war, no longer exist. Yet, Palestinians whose families hail from these villages still have the keys to homes that were demolished over half a century ago.
And it may be a while before I get back to blogging
This is going to be a long post so bare with it, might break it into two. Thursday, April 26th, was the Opening Night of the National Film Festival for Talented Youth 2012 (NFFTY 2012). The red carpet was laid out, the lights were shining, filmmakers and fans were pouring it. There was energy and excitement in the air. As an intern, my task for the night was to capture the atmosphere of the event through creative and stylized b-roll coverage. This means shooting crowd shots, branding, establishing shots, capturing random moments of awesome throughout the night that can be used as inserts and cutaways for the highlight videos that are put out during the festival. So for the entire first part of the night, I was running around the entirety of the famous Seattle Cinerama, weaving in and out of some of the world’s most talented young filmmakers.
There you have it. I still need to do the the panels for the right and left sides of the crib but this first panel was so easy, I think I can knock out the other 2 tonight and cross another thing off my to-do list. Yay!
1. QuickBooks
In the meantime, please review this brief study about the "talking donkey." There IS a bit more to this story than most speculators are willing to seek out. Thanks for this commentary I hope to see more like this in HuffPost.
According to the application, the Druidstone Road site is owned by a Mr M Evans.
Morello: So it’s going to be an AP carry then.
And I know I didn't blog yesterday. I only made it 10 days into my 30 day challenge. But that's OK. Yesterday, I was thankful for a warm house, and blankets and slippers on a beautiful cold fall day. And for grace when I need it (and I always need it.)
***I'm not quite sure why I'm giving you a spoiler warning for a twenty-plus-year-old Women-in-Prison movie, but I guess if you want all the fragrant freshness of its story to unfold in a pure fashion, you'd better stop reading here***
alas the above title makes this seem like I am 9 years old, and have been to the beach with a bucket and spade and a worry free unembittered cloud of relentless optimism bubbling above my brow. Alas its not like or about that. This is Britain. Its cold. I am middle aged. I am not in the least bit optimistic about any attractions I visit. I am woefully unexcited about almost everything i undertake. Except going to the pub of course which is usually tremendously rewarding...
I could try and explain to you that this isn't about eliminating fraud, that this will affect you or your family when inevitably accident, sickness or ageing moves you from being 'not yet disabled' to 'one of us'. I could try, but that's the nightmare of 4am no-one wants to remember when they awake. I could tell you that understanding, that empathy, that sense of life altering devastation is an insight that will only come to you when it's too late.
Using the numbers 1-7 can you make the three ‘arms’ of the Y total the same number. The boys have found one solution, but can you find any others? Why not add your solutions to this post, or bring them into school to put on the maths wall? Are there other letters which could be used for similar problems?
And there is one thing even worse than that.
assailants, numbering more than
well, we had her all ready to go to a certain school.
Maybe I'm better off alone.
You would think that I would put out more than 515 words on average in that three-hour work window, but don't be fooled: dredging great writing out of my soul is fairly time-consuming, because my soul is pretty far away.
In much modern architecture, everything is streamlined - flat surfaces and geometric shapes without the ornamentation that lends character and beauty to so many older buildings. So-called ‘rational’ architecture eschews tradition and local and national vernacular styles and materials, leading to conformity and an artificialism that make people feel out of place. It is impossible to love tower blocks or office buildings built along these lines, or places dominated by such buildings.
1/2 C Goat Cheese Crumbles- I bet I used less than this, just because I had a tiny taste of the goat cheese before I put it in the pasta and about yacked. I am not sure what magical thing happens to the cheese when you toss it around with all of these other ingredients, but all of the sudden it not only becomes tolerable but very, very, VERY good.
One of the producers from Anderson Cooper's new tv show "Anderson" came across my blog online and she contacted me.
Seriously, I thought men wanted a woman who is always up for it. And when I'm really into someone I am, truth is I think they found my libido intimidating.
Rissad set the Stable Rod down on top of a flange running the length of the mechanism. The soft chink of contact seemed to reverberate long after it should have, a low moan that seemed to fill the entire chasm. "According to the plans. They built it to withstand pretty much anything, for a thousand years or more. And that possibly includes the Realmcrash."
ORTM television continues to air documentary programs, nothing at all about current events, and the ORTM’s two radio frequencies have also been broadcasting identical pre-recorded content. It seems that ORTM staff are not present in the studios, or at least not in sufficient numbers to produce and air live programs.
Before I go on, let’s recall that Mac OS X Leopard is the last Operating System from Apple to run on PowerPC Macs. They are out of the pictures.
I recently watched a movie called “Fierce People” and it caused a stirring in my mind, as so many other things do. In the final dialogue of the film the main character states, “We are the sum of all people we have ever met; you change the tribe and the tribe changes you.”
There’s no rain to dash through to get to the next tent.
John said he locked his patio door, ran upstairs and heard at least one gun shot.
So, how is Sarah doing at a year old?
Overall global communications spending for 2011 – including the United States – will reach $4.34 trillion dollars, and TIA forecasts it will top $5 trillion by 2013.
The two events were similar to a pair of quakes, measuring 5.9 and 5.3, that struck eastern Chechnya at a depth of 10km, about 240km to the NE, on October 11, 2008.
3/12/2012 Albuquerque, NM – Leo’s Nightclub
Meat. The most tender meat ever eaten. Here they distinguish between meat and chicken. Meat is red meat. This part of Brasil is known as Gaúcho country. It refers back to the only food that the first settlers were eating, meat for breakfast, lunch and diner. I always thought of the south of Argentina as the pampa land. But this landscape stretches well into Rio Grande do Sul. There is debate whether or not the Rio da Prata north of Buenos Aires is a division line, but those who do not take this consider all of Argentina, Uruguay and 63% of the state Rio Grande do Sul as “paisagem natural dos pampas”, some 700.000 km2. The Brasilian part is 178.243 km2 big and from a country perspective only 2 % of the Brasilian territory. However since it stretches over the most of this south state it is a significant landscape feature and cultural reference point here. In a way the southerners here have more in common with the “hermanos pampeanos do Uruguai e da Argentina” than with the north of Brasil.
_ Identifying which records should be shared online and developing an effective, safeguarded method for doing so.
Arcade Fire – Keep the Car Running – Neon Bible (2006)
In the 68th minute, after Ferguson had added a forward Mancini added a defensive player in bringing on Nigel De Jong for Carlos Tevez. A defensive move, perhaps, but with Toure now in a more advanced position and Park no longer tracking him he was free to run at United’s immobile centre. He was City’s best creative outlet late on as United chased the game and spaces opened up in front of him to run into.
I have made up a quote. "Heroin is for artist for whom the world is too painful to life without." ~Anna Young~ So many artist get caught up in drugs. I think we feel life on a much more raw level than others. I don't blame my past for my use of drugs. I was just rebelling. Found solice in opiates.
The elastic trimming the tabs 'flips'
What companies forget is that if you tend to like, for example, bourbon that is more than 6 years old, you will look for age statements that give you that information when you are looking for something new to try, and ignore all NAS products unless you are already familiar with them. It is, therefore, often a criteria for someone who wants to try something new, a quick way to reduce the number of candidates. If you're a producer, don't you want that trial? Isn't attracting new customers usually one of the pillars of successful brand growth?
Dr. Pilkey pointed out some of the island’s problems: protective dunes have been leveled for easy development; roads run straight back from the beach, providing overwash channels for floodwaters; marshes that could have absorbed storm water have been filled and built on. Even two low places on the island, where inlets formed in Hurricane Hazel in 1954, have houses on them now.
I have a distinct tendency to become sick or injured dramatically. This was most certainly the case the first time I ever visited Texas.
‘Hey… we’re here for you,’ my voice cracked a little. ‘And you’re not alone. Please remember that. Don’t torture yourself by keeping everything inside and hiding away.’
"The Conference will be on for a good few hours yet." Lynne tells me, "Shall we go for a walk around until then?"
By the way, I promised more relationship article links. Here’s one that just popped up today.
Combine ingredients and toss. Serve immediately.
The Israeli flag looks correct but only because the perspective of my shot is off. In reality, the top and bottom points of the Star of David that make up the centerpiece of this banner are not straight up and down as they are in the official version. Here at the Inka Market, the Star is lopsided.
No I’m not talking strictly finances…but in everyday life. Just as 1 penny today can change into $100 through gradual growth over time, so can other areas of your life like relationships, weight-loss, etc.
4. Provide affection
It can yield decades afore the asbestos acknowledgment after-effects in adverse effects, which is why asbestos action has connected for so abounding years and why asbestos accompanying deaths abide to increase. While some companies that accept been the ambition of the massive asbestos action problems accept argued for asbestos action reform, there are tens of bags of workers that could see their rights taken away.
1 orange, zested
This is the pecking order at the farm:
This same cat currently resides with a wonderful, dear friend of mine whom is 100% in love. And I find it a little ironic. This same friend adopted a young kitten about 2 years ago from a shelter (along with another kitten who also happened to be one of my fosters as well at the same time. This other kitten, was quiet, and lovely and sweet – and she named her Freya – 2 years later I get texts saying Freya isn’t well — they rush her to the ER one night and she’s humanely euthanized for a pretty significant heart murmur. Hindsight 20/20 says someone *cough cough a medical professional* probably should have been able to catch a murmur of that significance when she was young. But – i also know they develop sometimes as they get older – and there’s nothing to do be done about it.
Her dream of being a mother seemed impossible at times. But she loved that dream to fruition. She made difficult choices. She invested her time, energy and money.
“I now live in a gorgeous three-bedroom semi-detached house with a massive garden and its own beach.”
With one small gesture you can change a person's life, for
Anyway, enough of flattering myself on what a lovely one I caught... indeed.
Congratulations to this years nominees for the Academy Award® for Art Direction. This award is given to both the Production Designers and the Set Decorator who work hand in hand to create the built-world that's surrounds and helps define the characters in the movie. As we learned from our discussion with set decorator Beth Rubino (Something's Gotta Give & It's Complicated) on The Skirted Roundtable, set decoration is more than just pretty rooms, although we sure do love the pretty rooms!
I have to be honest, we didn't always have the easiest of relationships.
“This is one of those shows that has points of interest for a wide audience. One really can’t understand France in the first half of the 20th century without having some knowledge of Vuillard’s portraiture,” said Stephen Brown, assistant curator at The Jewish Museum.
I'm really glad I made these; otherwise, if it weren't for the blogging group, I may have overlooked them completely. And that would have been a shame! To see if the other members of the group liked these, head on over to the blogroll, here.
I realized, eventually, that I would need to make peace with my own childhood, and end the dysfunctional ways of relating that still existed within my family of origin.
It's a great, sturdy little handsome machine..I will have plenty of fun with this..
(UPDATE - August/2011 - After more than 100 further beer reviews, I reviewed Old Boy again as part of an experiment to see how much my taste in beer had evolved. Check out that new review here.)
Good morning all and welcome to week 27 of the Make My Monday challenge blog. OK - I have alot to tell you today so please make yourselves comfortable and I will begin.
just by the side of lips arched animated,
The Most Challenged Books of 2010: Proof We Need Our Libraries (Apr. 15): Another anti-censorship post, this time from my perspective as a librarian. I also did a series for Banned Books Week in the fall. This post closed out National Library week and provided a nice overview of the ongoing challenges faced by our libraries.
One thing I love about the Bible is its record of how little mankind has changed over the millennia.
First sentence: Phineas T. Pimiscule was not what you'd call an "attractive" man.
“Might be a small trail of blood. Goes from the car across this lawn, then stops about here.” The officer walked further, trying to pick up the trail, but found nothing. Chris turned to the car and put himself in line from the car to the trail. Turning back to the house, he looked over it at the trees behind that section of Greenbury Farms.
Aaaaahhhhhhh....I feel so much better now. And I have turned off comments, probably permanently, because I don't want to hear what you have to say unless you agree with me. Because for once I can honestly say: I'm right. And if you disagree with me? You're wrong.
Suitable: 18LV
In London, the equivalent truism is “Never go South of the River. Always remember. Never go South of the River.”
Give us this day our daily bread; Lead us not into temptation, but deliver us from the evil one
As to why we have no conclusive photos of this species, Michael suggests that Bigfoot differs from all other animals: This ape is smarter and knows full well that its most lethal enemy is mankind. So it makes sense, he says, that Bigfoot would lay low and keep out of gunshot range. Michael adds, however, that Bigfoot’s curious and wants to know his foe. This would explain the fleeting, distant images that we do see from time to time.
Today I’m changing this…
It was so nice to meet many new friends, and and get together with friends made last year. This is Lesley Langdon and I... Love this girl! Amazingly talented... a sweet spirit... and to beat all... she's CANADIAN! :) She was my partner in crime down there... good times! :)﻿ Every once in a while you meet someone who just feels like a kindred spirit... nuff said... :)
I can see why Paul worded his admonition the way he did. There “will be hurt and much damage…of our lives.” He added the centurion and master of the ship to those who were in danger. Were they not concerned for themselves?
He offered me some beer as I was leaving, and as a blogger, I have no morals about that kind of thing (the pay being so bad). But I didn't take the Apricot Ale. It was literally one of the best beers I've ever tasted. I was reminded of my experience drinking John Harris's Lupulin last year--it was such a shock to the senses. Sadly, the apricots were hard to filter out, and he lost a fair amount of that batch. I felt it was just too good to give away. That's one more bottle one of you can enjoy, and fifteen bucks is a steal. So act quick and you may still find that bottle.
Every recipe I've made to date is pictured over on the left column. (Cobbler through blondies...which is everything...because I've also been too busy to post recipes that came after my blogoversary!)
Men: BMR = 66 + ( 6.23 x weight in pounds ) + ( 12.7 x height in inches ) – ( 6.8 x age in year )
(be sure to visualize really nice lawns though, note the old people)
And one thing that was kind of cute was that at one point Christy called me over to watch a video she had taken so I could see what we looked like, and poor Oliver, hearing the voices on the camera behind him, really started to stress out. He was still as a statue, but I could feel his heart pounding, so I switched it off. He snapped right out of it as soon as we went back to work, but I think we'll need to work on desensitizing him a bit to things like that. I was rather proud of his composure though.
I've been pestered on three evenings this week by different charity door-knockers, all with proper i.d., sweatshirts and coats printed with the charity's names.
"I want to watch Dora!" Mercy exclaimed.
…is the Princess Culture simply innocuous fun?
Juan Armando Ceballos, 47, New York, N.Y.
What a departure for me -- this card is completely Cricut-LESS! My sister-in-law's style leans more toward modern than mine, so I kept my interpretation of the sketch simple. I like how the embossing and turning the words in different directions turned out, too.
From the minute those models emerged to a 1980s teen-film soundtrack we wanted to be part of their gang. Hair scraped back, ghetto-fabulous twists of metals dangling from each ear, and stomping down the catwalk like they had classes to cut and boys to french kiss and cigarettes to smoke out the window of the bathrooms, which, let's be honest, they all probably did, they looked like they had walked fresh out of a John Hughes movie, or Heathers. But they were clad in next season Zimmermann and oh, how it made all the difference. Although the designer Nicky referenced the surety of being young, that sense of being invincible and not giving a damn, it was a youthfulness that moved seamlessly from the late 1970s through the 80s, into the 90s and ending firmly yet so squarely in the now. Where else would you witness those ballooning strapless midi-dresses, all chintz-y floral print, descending dramatically into laser-cut dot cut-outs? Where else would you see those slashed one-shouldered one-pieces, forming the shape of a giant, emblazoned floral Z on the model's stomach? The models owned every single look, from the wearable (oversized peek-a-boo sweaters and floral midi skirts) to the, well, slightly more wacky, (sleeveless tuxedo-cut mini-short romper, anyone?). They had attitude and sass and high-school hair-flipping bitchiness oozing from every pore, and we simply couldn't look away.
a few walk past – money in their pockets
Not so in Kenya. The level of intractability is debilitating. Teachers here would actually rather die than try something new in some cases. It tends to be the teachers who received their education via chalk and talk or they are 45 + in age, similar to the phenomenon of America where older teachers are more reluctant to change. In Kenya, the chalk and talk phenomenon is exactly what I had seen in Namibia ten years ago except that in Namibia, the teachers were at least ‘curious’ about a different way of teaching. I have run up against teachers here who are so firmly entrenched they have to have lead in the cement holding their feet in place.
I adapted this recipe from a few different recipes. It's not an exact recipe; I use what I have on hand, and I don't measure when I cook. Feel free to add more or less depending on what you have or your family's taste. Since the prep work is done the night before, it takes almost no time to prepare this the day you cook it. I like to make this whole chicken in the Crock Pot, but you could make bake it in the oven for a crispy outside.
I picked out a plain front door and painted it barn red, which I had left over from the red front door at the fixer upper house. I know, I know I've gone wild and crazy with all these red front doors all over the place ;)
3. I also re-used the bottom purple velvet jewelry box holder from UD's 15th Anniversary Palette (shown here) to store my perfume. I can fit at least 5 bottles in the box without spending more money for storage.
I’m not wearing a hat and gloves, you Neanderthal.
During the trip you can listen to music, but you can choose the voice of a guide as well. There are speakers inside and also outside of the tram. Apart from that there is a possibility of playing CD or DVD materials on three LCD screens.
Admission is €10, and is, as ever, supporting the Simon Community.
· If you are moving to Europe, don’t bring all your furniture from ZA, the houses are smaller and buying new furniture is cheaper than paying for shipping. Also in Ireland & the UK (not sure about other countries in Europe) rented houses are almost always fully furnished. All you need to get is some bedding and towels etc. (cheap enough). Have enough money for the first month’s rent and the deposit.
4.) (5 April 2006) The players were “thinking, ‘I was entitled to do this. I’m a member of a wealthy white boy’s school in a community that allow me to do what I want when I want. They’ve gotten away with a lot for a very long time. Why not go home and celebrate?’ . . . The e-mail shows that these guys were of the mind that whatever had happened to this woman was just another day at the beach. They’ll rape her, sodomize her and tomorrow they’ll kill her.”
Well, they found out two things, basically. One, they analyzed stories from four years ago when President Bush was president and from this month when President Obama is president regarding higher gas prices.
how can there really be security, I
The six of us have been playing together now for about eight months but I guess you could say that we've been together as "Of Monsters and Men" for about a year now. Our mission has always been simple. We just want to make good music and have fun. Simple as that.
If I'm gonna hit a traffic jam,
The website is the product of several decades’ work by Chuck Schader, a radio broadcaster (and major fanatic) in the Chicago area. Schader hosted a radio show called “Those Were the Days” from 1970-2009 and was lucky enough to get interviews with most of the major figures from radio’s past. He nabbed a bunch of them when they were passing through Illinois doing summer stock
The reason for that article? In the aftermath of 9/11 and with the Afghanistan war barely a month old, the Guardian needed to provide any reason it could to show why the Afghanistan operation was a bad idea and of course to try to stop further interventions. So it shamefully poured cold water on the renowned success of Blair’s Sierra Leone intervention.
The magic of Christmas Eve. I hope yours was wonderful, too.
- There's this theorem, one from my work, listen. This is funny. I work for a Jap company. Man, the stuff in our manuals, such Japglish, shit, you know? There is this measurement you, you know, like, for the heart, it's called the continuity something, the Continuity Equation, but the manual says, like, "many point of measurement to equal together", or something. I mean, what is that? Continuity Equation. Something to do with Bournoulli's equation, theorem, something. Flow in flow out, sorta thing.
Mikey’s birthday was on 4/26/12 and we went to celebrate at his new boy toy’s restaurant, Lanny’s Kitchen, in Fort Worth. I’d planned on going to the gym and was soooo ready when he called me for lunch. Why, yes! I pretended to put up a fight stating I was getting flabby buttt can’t turn down food for nothing. Neither he nor I had ever been here before. Heck, we didn’t even know it existed! As soon as we walked in, he wearing shorts and a button down and me sporting workout gear, we knew it wasn’t up to par to “dress code.” You know what I mean… when it looks fancy, you gotta look like you belong, too!
No puppies yet either. Ellie is big. Her puppy den ready and we put her in it every once in a while but she doesn't really want to stay yet.
***Unless they fit into category number five in which case, I've decided it's allowed.
World of fantasy-7sinners
And it was. And I bought it. And it is everthing that I expected. Obviously recorded in a basement--dreadfully mixed (and as a band widow I have heard some muddy mixes), and the singer uses that real low, kind of growling, voice that death metal musicians do. Except in this case -- maybe due to the mixing? -- it sounds like he's burping all the lyrics.
But you can create heaven on earth by learning and acting on the truth.
Then we begin, and we are asked to set an intention and I pray “God help me value my body today”. If I’m lucky at some point, even for a second, I’ll be challenged so much that I’ll ignore the hottie next to me and the mirrors all around the room, and I can focus on nothing else but balance and strength.
empty. Below, we keep filling
And a friend who will always be there.
Rut-roh. Looks like it is closed? The doors are shut...
This week we would like to you to please make a project that has something to do with Mom! It can be a Mother's Day card, gift, something that reminds you of your Mom or being a Mother/Grandmother...you get the picture!
book 2/5, movie 1/5.
Public Safety Department’s Annual Commendation Ceremony
I am not honest and frank about me and my business because the truth is such a great thing…I do it because I already know I am going to be talked about. Just tell the truth when you do so. I was an awkward child…physically and socially and I have never seen myself as a beauty, conventional or otherwise. I work hard at my jobs and do good work, even great work…but I do not do the best job I possibly can because for me, doing the right thing makes no difference…I am always the one let go, both personally and professionally. Some days I just want to cry because I am Charlie Brown with the football…everything is lined up perfectly, and then it is snatched away and I am falling flat on my back wondering what the hell just happened. So my self-esteem, my self-respect, my self-confidence, my self-worth have always been tied to jobs, men and money. Tangible things…if I have the job, I am worth something to society. If I have the man, I am worthy of attention and desires. If I have the money…hell, name something money can’t buy. People say happiness, but for the longest time I swore it bought reasonable facsimiles of it.
The only people likely to be supporters of such an innovation from Microsoft would be game publishers who lose revenue to GameStop, and game retailers such as GameStop would be devastated by the loss. Being one of the few used-game retailers left, the store has a sort of video-game market monopoly. Whereas if GameStop could no longer profit from used-game sales, gamers would probably choose to shop elsewhere, like at Walmart or Amazon.com, where games tend to drop more quickly in prices.
National Disaster Relief Force head Alok Jha said the bodies of 103 victims, including women and children, were recovered by the BSF and the NDRF personnel near Jaleswar.
"Jones Harvest Publishing along with 230 (so far) plus SIX OTHER COMPANIES is finally filing suit against Bonnie Kaye. I already paid the Miller Law Group in West Lawn PA for the whole thing, so I don't need any money from you or anyone.
One thing I wish they would improve on is the menu. I would like some photos on the menu just so I get an idea what I’m ordering. Although each item has description of how the food is cooked or the ingredients used, something visual, at least for the “must try” items, would be better.
Though Raven had no hand in the development of Crucible, it proved the ideal first vehicle for him, with the bizarre plotting that was so much a feature of the subsequent Disciple of Death already much in evidence.
So in mid-January our only car broke. It would cost thousands to fix AND it isn't worth thousands. But that's okay because we just did our taxes and our return will be back shortly so we can buy a new one. We had to paper file due to the adoption. And that is where the problems started.
The most common cause of fingernails that suddenly take on an unhealthy tinge is some type of fungal infection. Both yeast infections and bacterial infections can easily be picked up at an unsanitary nail salon—usually caused by the use of unsterilized tools. “A yeast infection can cause the nail to separate from the underlying skin,” says Kleinsmith. “The nail can start lifting up and a crumbly, white fungus can appear underneath it.” A bacterial infection can cause the affected nail to turn slightly green. And getting too vigorous with the cuticle pusher or nippers can lead to either a yeast or bacterial infection in the cuticle surrounding the nail. “If you notice sudden swelling or pain in the cuticles a day or two after a manicure, see a doctor to get on antibiotics,” she recommends.
taking photos of every detail.
“Years from now, people may remember me as a golfer and a major champion, but I’d like to be remembered as a father who took the issue of autism and tried to make a difference,” said Els. “The success of the Els for Autism Golf Challenge in 2011 far exceeded my expectations, and on behalf of my family and the thousands of families affected by autism, I’d like to extend our heartfelt appreciation to all of the participants, the PGA TOUR and its TPC Network, and all our sponsors, particularly SAP for opening their hearts and going above and beyond in support of this important initiative. This year’s event promises to be even better, and thanks to everyone’s collective efforts, we’ll be able to deliver the best possible treatment to children on the autism spectrum around the world.”
Not fully understanding what was happening, because he still believed it would be alright in the end, the Cherub sat in with his dad, joked about him sounding like Darth Vadar and talked to him about x box, and walking the dog, and pasta for dinner again.
After death, the judgment. When we die, we die not. When a man dieth, shall he live again? Ay, that he shall—for his spirit dieth never. We are immortal, every one of us, and when the stars go out and Sol’s great furnace is extinguished for want of fuel, and like a vesture God’s wide universe shall be rolled up, we shall be living still, a life as eternal as the Eternal God himself. Oh, when we leave this world we are told that after death there comes a judgment to us. I do not know how it is with you— you may be more accustomed to courts of justice than I am—but there always creeps a solemnity over me, even in a common court of justice among men, and especially when a man is being tried for his life. Laughter seems hushed there, and everything is solemn. How much more dread will be that Court where men shall be tried for their eternal lives, where their souls rather than their bodies shall be at stake.
The insurance payment that he really needed. His wife dying kept him from work, provided overnight, a series of bills totaling well into the thousands of dollars. I was uptight every time I picked up the phone to update him on the progress. I felt terrible the day I called him to let him know that I had his $25,000 cheque. Then he said Thank you, with a audible sigh of grief and peace choked together. He wanted to be glad that he was released from his financial burdens but the reality of his wife's life equating to a dollar figure was a lot to bare.
So when Sascha starts feeling emotions she is afraid that her shields in her mind that she has made over the years will break and the rest of the Psy will learn that she is “broken”. And because the Psy believe they cannot leave the Net, she knows that her days are numbered.
25 pause 0:51
Zantavia Williams, 14, was among the students charged. The five girls and two boys all attended Liberty Middle School.
Charity the YWCA is hosting the ‘Women Finding Solutions to Binge Drinking’ conference on October 21.
It's about: This tragic novel-play (Steinbeck's first experiment with the form) takes place in rural California during the Depression. It centers around a pair of migrant ranch hands: a mentally-handicapped strongman named Lennie and his watchful guardian, George.
Southern Brownie Pie
I am bracing myself for many, shall I say, "unkind" comments in response to posting this article. This issue is so evil I question even sharing it on my blog. However, upon doing a Google search on this same article, I found that it was listed on only six different web addresses. I did find many other articles condemning "Twilight," but nowhere was discussed the demon-possession of the author of the books and other such hidden facts. In one way, I doubt that I personally need to share this information. It seems superfluous to me. We know what God says is wicked and we know that we are to avoid it. However, I know for a fact that this abomination has been accepted by independent Baptist believers. The truth of God's Word concerning this evil that so many Christians are embracing must be published!
There may be the opportunity for anyone who has a special edition from the first book to reserve the same edition number, if they wish, for volume two.
Celebrating the new Acheron era, in appreciation of our contributors and supporters, and finally as a gesture from the Glorious Times to YOU, the ones who visit our myspace and facebook pages - or just stumble into this blog - we offer you this amazing peek into time for one of the highly influential bands and personas of extreme music.
24.12 is a Saturday, so the regular 1030 workout will be on.
Beckoning men every day
Find A Grave.com
Notes: For future psychotherapy fun, try saying this to your actual kids!
But, I decided that just because I am alone now, doesn’t mean my dreams have to stop. On the contrary. I can travel without fear of being impaled by a mailbox when my husband would drive in the direction he is looking when he really should be paying attention to the road. No, this would be much better. And why in the world would I be lonely? I would be with me!
The elimination of “injustice” — which is not defined for his audience — remains the primary purpose of his call for a moratorium. In order to understand what he means, the reader should follow his advice and respect the “scriptural sources of Islam”.
Every center of force adopts a perspective toward the entire remainder, i.e., its own particular valuation, mode of action, and mode of resistance. The "apparent world," therefore, is reduced to a specific mode of action on the world, emanating from a center.
The leaves were created out of SU Certainly Celery and River Rock using MS Branches Fir and Spellbinders On the Vine Border die. I used an embossing tool to crease in the lines on the leaves. You don't need the exact same punches as I used, and the layers don't need to be the same style. Just make sure the sizes gradually decrease.
“Luigi’s Pizzeria has always been known as the pizza shop around the corner that the community can depend on to provide high quality slices and pies to residents, students, local churches, as well as to me when in need of a snack after a long work-day. The restaurant will continue to provide delicious Italian food in honor of its founder, a big-hearted man remembered for making sure that locals were fed, regardless of the money in their pockets,” said Council Member James.
Many people wait until they are in trouble before suddenly scrambling to build connections (we’ve all seen that pattern on LinkedIn, right?). But that’s the wrong time. The right time to build your professional network is 5 years ago, and the second best time is right now. You want to have an opportunity network of great quality people in place long before you need them.
Cold-blooded Fire elemental Mab Monroe has hired one of the smartest assassins in the business to trap me. Elektra LaFleur is skilled and efficient, with deadly electrical elemental magic as potent as my own Ice and Stone powers. Which means there’s a fifty-fifty chance one of us won’t survive this battle. I intend to kill LaFleur—or die trying—because Mab wants the assassin to take out my baby sister, Detective Bria Coolidge, too.
How could we then realize that we have God’s calling if we didn’t encounter Him first? For every encounter with God, there is a revelation.
Treston, T-Bear, precious boy of mine.
Tonight the kids and I spent the evening with the new pool that I got from the extremely pregnant one at work that you read about yesterday. The kids of course loved the little built in slide!
Short of having the President of the United States or Jay Leno deliver the commencement address at your university or college, I would put money on the fact that few graduates can tell you who did give the speech, let alone what they said.
Whenever Montreal has been on the road this year, it’s always a question as to who would be on the track this time? The match at Tri-City had featured a short-benched Contrabanditas with substitutes from the other MTLRD teams, as had the match between CN Power and the Sexpos. So in the bout at Forest city, who would Les Filles du Roi feature on the roster? While the programme stated the following: “That’s What She Said / Asil-X / Raffy Duck / Krakatoa / Beth Rave / Magnum P.E.I. / Waxey McBush / Al Strapone / Phunky Bladz / Dame of Doom”, all in all there three imports played for Les Filles du Roi that night: Rouge, Nameless Whorror, and Krakatoa.
To do this, I used the actual print that was in the frame, as my backing board and then just used spray adhesive to stick the bus roll sheets on the backing board. I was very careful to trim them using a rotary cutter. I was equally careful when sticking them down...
I finally make it HEB, which seemed to take 5 hours. I walk with purpose through the parking lot, breeze past the cheese and bread areas, and make it to Wine/Beer. Plenty of good stuff, but the St Arnolds section had no DR7. The wine/beer guy is not there, and I find someone who looks like a manager. We both look around, and there is nothing there. He says he'll get with the manufacturer tomorrow to get the beer there. I thank him, but apparently he is not aware of the power of St Arnolds Divine Reserve. It is an underground Holiday in Houston, TX when a DR comes out. Normally it sells out within an hour. People are a stone's throw away from performing sexual favors for a 6 pack.
The only problem is, both of these methods of using Facebook for marketing are seriously flawed.
“There is no use. She’ll make up everything we ask. I have a bad feeling about this. I don’t get positive energy from her. It’s like she’s blessed with evil.” said Jin.
Since I am outta town this week I thought I would just share with you one of our favorite go to recipes because this week our menu plan says MOMMY GONE DADDY AND KENDALL PICK!
The standards have been developed by the Intercollegiate Committee for Standards for Children and Young People in Emergency Care Settings led by the Royal College of Paediatrics and Child Health and are designed to help service planners overcome some of the key challenges in emergency healthcare – including the impact of the European Working Time Directive which sets maximum daily and weekly working hours and increased public expectation of immediate access to care.”
He could see her almost too perfect breasts partly shadowed in the diminished light.
One of rock's most enduring and insightful parodies, brilliantly mirroring The Beatles' career, “The Rutles” is the soundtrack to the spoof documentary television film “All You Need Is Cash,” which aired on NBC in the U.S. on March 22, 1978. The brainchild of Neil Innes and former Monty Python member Eric Idle, the film is beloved by Beatles fans worldwide and even features a cameo from George Harrison as a TV reporter. The Rutles themselves were Neil Innes as Ron Nasty (Lennon), Eric Idle as Dirk McQuickly (McCartney), Rikki Fataar as Stig O'Hara (Harrison) and John Halsey as Barry Wom (Ringo). The fifth Rutle, for recording purposes, was guitarist Ollie Halsall. It should be noted that Eric Idle does not perform on this CD. He lip-synched to Halsall’s vocals in the TV movie. This expanded CD issued in 1990 adds six tracks to the 14-track vinyl version first released by Warner Bros. in 1978. The soundtrack reached #63 on the Billboard album charts.
Fourteen hours earlier, I’d watched doctors lift Meeko’s heart from his body and place it, still beating, in a plastic dish. He looked no worse for the experience, whisking away a fly with his tail as he nibbled, demonstrably alive—though above his head, a monitor showed a flatlined pulse. I held a stethoscope to his warm, fragrant flank and heard, instead of the deep lub-dub of a heartbeat, what sounded like a dentist’s drill or the underwater whine of an outboard motor. Something was keeping Meeko alive, but it was nothing like a heart.
From the banned 1950s horror comics that Dr. Fredric Wertham of the U.S. Senate and mothers didn't want innocent children to devour comes a terrifying and timely anthology of comics of the undead... Zombies. These gruesome mini-masterpieces are hauntingly delineated by some of the Golden Age''s greatest artists: Jack Cole, Bob Powell, Howard Nostrand, Wally Wood, Gene Colan, Lou Cameron, Reed Crandall, and others at their very best. The nightmarish scripts of the unstoppable living dead will make your spine freeze over in terror!
Please note that without RapidPro, your inactive files will be deleted according to our Terms of Use. You currently have the following files in your account, which will be deleted within the next days.
Following clean eating principles of combining a complex carb and lean protein, this yummy breakfast granola is packed with carbs and protein. This breakfast will deinfitely give you enough energy to get through the morning. Each 1/2 cup serving has 11 grams of protein!
Consider the possibility that, to kids, smaller wounds are just as gaping and scary and overwhelming. Consider that kids with smaller wounds are just as deserving of compassion as that boy with the zombie mom, and that they are just as entitled to some time and space to feel what they're feeling. And consider that asking them to bottle their emotions is just another way to lose them to the zombies.
Still intact.....
"Taste and see that the Lord is good; blessed is the man who takes refuge in him. Fear the Lord, you his saints, for those who fear him lack nothing. The lions may grow weak and hungry, but those who seek the Lord lack no good thing."
I procrastinated on homework all day. So much for trying to get things done quickly! That'll never happen as long as I'm still me and I don't have some weird alien creature taking over my body. (Referencing the Goa'uld. JUST GO WATCH STARGATE AND BE DONE WITH IT. But not Universe, Sg-1 or Atlantis.)
Hears bold words, unreproving;
Here's the down-low: Dr. Sketchy's started in New York and has branched out throughout the U.S...Basically, this once-a-month or so event combines burlesque, a bar, and sketch pads for a fun day of figure drawing.
Ironically, Clark left the Byrds shortly after "Eight Miles High" was released partly because of his fear of flying. He also wasn't pleased that the group's record company had decided to make Roger McGuinn the Byrds' primary lead singer, relegating Clark to a secondary role.
*Zest 3 large oranges and chop fine then add one cup sugar to zest. DO not leave out this step. Fresh oranges are best.
After a long walk from the City Centre to the Grandstand on the outskirts of the city (where SPUC had bravely decided to hold their demonstration, well away from the public and potential opponents), we arrived at 11.00, just as the pro-lifers finished praying and began to align themselves along the kerb with signs declaring that abortion ‘kills children and hurts women’, along with a premium rate phone number for an anti-abortion helpline. We quickly set up on the opposite side of the main road with our own pro-women and pro-choice placards. They apparently weren’t anticipating any opposition and looked quite shocked to see us there.
the real reasons for the break-up are not for me to judge….however…and this is a big however….when i see the s2bx beating herself up and regurgitating the reasons for the breakup she has been manipulated into believing to cover up someone else’s calculated path to the breakup….i get pissed. add to that my genuine concern of the s2bx and the s2bx's cold response back to me because i am supposedly best friends with the person breaking up with her (and it occurred to me that your friend's behavior can be a reflection on you and i am working my ass off to improve and evolve myself )…and i just couldn’t take it anymore. i could not take the manipulation and the effect it was having on the innocent partner. so i told my so-called best friend that. needless to say we are no longer best friends…not even friends…and i am ok with that…because in the series of email messages to me after i spoke up to her she went.too.far.
Later as they glared at each other over the dinner table - the underwear of guilt between them - she waited for an explanation.Waited for the dagger of deceit and betrayal to strike in her heart.
Everything is as it should be.
The rules demand the two elements to be a “closed section” to the side of the middle 15cm, so BMW’s wing meets the wording of the regulation as there is no inlet in these areas.
This painting of an eccentric entymologist’s dream by the great Edmund Dulac, conjures up mixed feelings of amusement and of sadness.
Wishing you a wonderful Tuesday.
The steel-drenched production (by the artist with James Mitchell) has only fiddle missing from the pure country mix and is an aural delight with a relaxed Strait-style feel on much of the material. Jerry’s voice isn’t the most distinctive, but it is nice and he has mature, lovely phrasing. The songs were all written or co-written by Jerry, and are all pretty solid lyrically, while he has a great knack for writing melodies, and there is a good mix of moods and tempos.
It is my goal to bring the transgendered community a site that is classy and ran with common sense and from the heart, and not as a business. True, it does take a little money to run it - but again, members of PinkEssence have never failed to setup and fill a need when the call was put out. We have a small donation button on the front page - but it is NEVER required EVER from anyone to ever offer anything.
While in terms of international fame “Grandma Toy” might have been a minor figure, in the 30 year old life of Toy’s performing grandchild Jillian Tully there has been no one more major. I sat down with Jillian in a Greek diner in Astoria last night and she told me the whole story.
In what ways have you experienced Christ’s strength in your life?
While Qualters spent parts of three years getting into games for the Phillies, he only appeared in eight games. Tom only spent part of one season with the Pale Hose and got into twenty-six games, mostly as a mop up pitcher. His numbers in Chicago were much better than in Philadelphia, but that couldn't secure him a roster spot on the 1959 team. He spent 1959 and part of 1960 in the White Sox minor league system before finally hanging it up in 1962. Tom's last MLB game was on September 25, 1958 with the White Sox against the Detroit Tigers in the ninth inning of a 7-1 loss. Qualters gave up a home run to Gail Harris, the first man he faced in that last inning. If Red Wilson didn't hit into a line drive double play, Tom's next batter would've been Coot Veal.
Packed with great ideas, enjoyable stories and delicious sounding recipes, Real Simplicity is a worthwhile read for families who have traded peace and simplicity for busyness and stuff.
Racial Equality is anathema to God, for if it weren’t, Poles would have been born with greater ability to shoot hoops, and Blacks would have been born with greater ability to solve differential equations. That part alone, equal outcomes for all, is enough to make of a former empire a dusty province fit for cubicle serfs toiling in the bowels of the Ministry of Truth and preyed upon by imported yahoos — all probably under the colonial administration of a people that has not yet ascended to Echelons Above Reality — say, the Chinese.
Think in the prospect’s perspective. To understand how your prospective parents view your center and its staff and services, you must be keenly aware of their perceptions. Tour your own center as if you were a skeptical parent, and note anything they might see (and never mention to you) as a red flag. It could be a dirty entryway, a teacher’s apathy, a misspelled word on a bulletin board. Ask questions throughout the enrollment inquiry and the center visit, noting emotional reactions as much as the words they say. Watch parents’ body language during tours, and address both negative and positive triggers with staff.
I have taken this weekend to really think about what it means to be American. And the Beats have said it best.
I'm swapping posts today with my bloggy friend Ashley from Domestic Fashionista! We are both sharing 7 things that are inspiring us this Spring. Enjoy!
I liked what Steve Jobs said about the creative process:
You can either apply online or walk in for interviews and fulfill the north dakota indian artifact of professional placements according to the north dakota indian artifact. Visiting the Little Missouri State Park and Icelandic State Park. This state has more than doubled in the north dakota indian artifact. That's why they provide many seasonal events to make the north dakota indian artifact in most regards. North Dakota singles are not insured by the north dakota indian artifact are visiting. This is what lenders will think the north dakota indian artifact, the state suffer the north dakota indian artifact of state's health programs.
Now when our faithful Armstrong was exchanged for a Daimler,
Edward Weston (1 palladium or platinum print, 1925)
STEVE EDWARDS (Breaking Into the Backcountry)
Murphy used to work for architects Frank Gehry and Richard Meier prior to his career as a production designer and it shows -- his work on The Sopranos earned him three Emmy nominations for art direction. The Playboy Club featured two story sets complete with cocktail lounges, dance floor, pool tables, restaurant and of course, the trademark bunny logo. I feel certain this show would have garnered him a fourth nomination.
Here is a brief summary of Apple's consumer advertising activity as observed by this writer:
On the birth certificate released by the White House, the listed place of birth is "Kapi'olani Maternity & Gynecological Hospital". This cannot be, because the hospital(s) in question in 1961 were called "KauiKeolani Children's Hospital" and "Kapi'olani Maternity Home", respectively. The name did not change to Kapi'olani Maternity & Gynecological Hospital until 1978, when these two hospitals merged. How can this particular name of the hospital be on a birth certificate dated 1961 if this name had not yet been applied to it until 1978?.
6. Ask for God’s help – We have a chance as human beings to participate in the miracle processes.
Here are pictures from our Thanksgiving weekend.
Part 2 – The Splendid End in which the party is victorious against the darkness and shadow
How on EARTH is it Thursday already!?
09. Pull The Strings
I thought to myself, Is he putting fairy lights in the tree?
THE HOURGLASS DOOR by Lisa Mangum
Life has brought me the chance for reflection and it's left me with a desire for some big changes.
Why do we want to remain where we started
Some North West Coastal tribes had impressively carved cedar masks which could open at a pivotal point in a story to reveal a second mask carved within the first one.The Hopi and Pueblo tribes carved and painted wooden Kachina Masks. Kachina are the symbols of spirits who control crops, weather, health and all other aspects of life. Kachina are also symbols of ancestors who are highly regarded by the Hopi. There are more than five-hundred indivdual Kachina known. Kachina are more commonly know in the form of Kachina dolls. Each doll has it's own special markings, color, and decoration and are used mostly during the winter and summer solstice ceremonies. They are usually carved from Cottonwood trees and range from an inch to a foot in length. Kokopelli is the most popular and well recognized of the Kachina. Kokopelli is a hump backed flute player who is believed to bring good luck, health and happiness to the homes he adorns and is also known as the teacher of Kachina carving.
C: Well, I just thought I'd check in... (tone suggests I should have already called) How much longer did you stay after I left?
But fear not, dear reader! ;) I'm here with you today with my Raise the Bar inspiration. This week is all about our mothers. Since my mom lives in another city, I mailed her off a card already. This is one I made for the challenge and will likely use next year.
Was the President serious on this? Was the President just tried to make us laugh? It was not funny. It was very senseless!
Modern Pirates, Sex Slavers, Human Trafficking
I crushed the digestive biscuits, mixed in melted butter and dried them out in the oven. The oven thing really made the difference, as the base was so crunchy & tasted really good.
Chaelura discussed a question/poll on her blog.
Wyrobek AJ. Male biomarkers of abnormal reproductive outcome. Health and Environment Digest 1990; 4: 1-4.
Fiona Doherty, representing two of the victims at a preliminary hearing in Belfast, said: “Developments like this out of the blue don’t assist my clients in trying to come to terms with the progress of an inquest which is long overdue and any suspicions they have about why these deaths occurred.”
Rumors have been surrounding the iPhone 5 for months now. Much of what iLounge claims will be coming to the device has already been cited in previous rumors. And in each case, Apple has stayed tight-lipped, allowing the rumor mill to heat up and speculation to run rampant. So, be sure to take all of this with a healthy heaping of salt until the final product is officially announced.
- 1 Tbl. Montreal Seasoning by McCormick (or similar grill seasoning)
When it comes to landscapes – what you’re really ambushing is the light. As you work an area with your camera – take note of key features, something that would lend itself to a strong composition. Check the sun, and if there are fast moving clouds, get ready! If you find something that will help you to create a fantastic image, get into position early, get set – and then wait for that fleeting moment of good light. There have been several images that I’ve created where the light was only conducive to what I wanted for a handful of seconds. Because I was ready… I got the shot. So, learn to ambush the light!
One way I plan on encouraging my students is to send home a parent letter giving parents suggestions on how to help their child be successful during our FCAT week. The letter will also ask them to write an encouraging note to their child and send back to school in a sealed envelope. I'll give this note to their child on Monday morning before we start testing.
We have begun looking into how we as believers can experience true joy in our daily worship, even in the midst of serious suffering and strife, but to do this there are some things we must first understand about the word joy. So to understand fully what joy means, and to correctly apply it to our everyday life and worship, we will have to dissect the word; cut into what we said joy is and look around inside it — find what lies at its core. To do this we will literally take the word “joy” and examine it letter by letter. When we are done, the acrostic we end up with will be a simple and applicable tool with which you can allow God to bring real joy to you daily.
If you are zooming past in a vehicle with a camera, you can’t feel that baba’s hunger. You have to experience that particular kind of pain to empathise with another person’s pain. That is why the problems of the rag-pickers will be solved only by the rag-pickers and by the poverty-stricken by the poverty-stricken. That is why women will solve their own problems and Indians will solve the problems of India.
- Continue to the North and follow the small path to the East. It will lead you to the wall surrounding the generators’ yard.
"Thank you," she said. "Come, let us step from here and let Derue and Edouard speak."
The record of controversy concerning the detrimental effects of soft drinks and other products using “fake sugars” could consume an entire library, and I am not going to debate that. The real issue here is how one can balance the risk versus benefit approach to use of alternative sweeteners in reducing sugar intake, either for the purpose of weight loss or blood sugar control. Instead of coming outright and saying authoritatively that one is better than the other, I propose doing what any good teacher does (or should do) – give you knowledge. What you choose to do with this knowledge is your own responsibility. Hopefully your decision will be an educated one.
We had 7 tacos, coffee and a coke for $8.80 and it was pretty good.
fervently try.
Who’s mouth fell so displaced
Thanks so much to everyone who played along in last week's challenge. We thoroughly enjoyed seeing all your wonderful creations! Be sure to stop back tomorrow and see who our winner is and who has been chosen to be in our Top 3!
Princess in a cloud dress
It operates in blessing
I knew we could eat deliciously for every meal. Some of our "normal" meals already are vegan, in fact. Like that bowl of beans and rice with zucchini, gently sloshed with a little vegetable broth and brightened with a squeeze of lemon.
The convictions were also based on questionable inmate testimony.
Last night was our monthly Friday Night Wine & Design at my house, but before I get into that I want to tell you about the swinging emotions I have had going on in the last two days.
Our rugs are perfect for adding a bit of flair to any room, so ask yourself this: Would you rather have a drab, boring room or an elegant, stylish room?
SWB Kahuna, Magic Rock Cannonball, Stone IPA, Sierra Nevada Torpedo, all on draught
the Bible is divinely inspired, but it was interpreted, God’s message was interpreted, by fallible human beings, who were constrained by their knowledge of facts about the universe, for instance, when they wrote. God, who created everything, knew that the size of stars and God knew that the earth was not the center of the universe. And when the Bible says that the stars would fall on earth as though they were little twinkling things, obviously that’s not factual. And so I believe the basic thrust of the Bible, the basic message of the Bible, is epitomized in the life of Christ and in the teachings of Jesus Christ. And I also believe that there is nothing in the Old Testament that contradicts the basic teachings of Christ for peace, justice, humility, love and so forth, and each person’s proper relationship with other human beings and also a relationship with God. So I believe in the miracles of the Bible. I believe that Jesus was come from a virgin birth. I believe Christ died for our sins on the cross. I believe He was resurrected and that we are promised, if we have faith in Christ through the grace of God, that we will inherit eternal life. I believe that God loved the world so much that He gave His only begotten Son. I believe those things, but I know that there are some things as a scientist—my background is in nuclear physics—there’re some things that weren’t understood by the writers of the Bible. I just ignored those
So, we drove back to Atlanta, my kids and I, after a delightful 3 days reunioning with the family. During my stint of night driving, an adult deer crossed over the interstate so close in front of me I couldn't see its legs. My heart stopped. The kids woke up. A second later, it would have been a sobering story. It's when we once again thanked the Universe for protecting us all along the way.
The rainy, stormy season is in full swing, and, rushing towards our annual seasonal floods the river level is already rising rapidly - as are, at times, my stress levels! However, days are being counted till our next planned sanity-saving break!
Just as before, be sure to spend 10-15 minutes exploring the following question, writing down all that comes as you explore. At the end of that 10-15 minutes, put down your pen and review what you have written. If any new insights come, be sure to write them down or make the appropriate notes for future reference. Also congratulations on following this through to this point. Most people never do this sort of exploration either for themselves or for their organization and are left struggling, lost and in need of clarity. In all of this, you have begun to clarify your direction, with focus, purpose and intent.
minded! YUM is all I can say, YUM!
Industrial Training College Wakefield 1st July 1978
Don't you just love a good surprise party?
January 02, 2011
Hollywood soon came calling. Pinza had already appeared in the 1947 classical farrago Carnegie Hall, but now he was to become a leading man. The first film to be released was Strictly Dishonorable, based on a Preston Sturges play. Pinza plays to type as an amorous opera star, and Janet Leigh as a music student who is smitten with him.
I used Flourishes "Spring Has Sprung" stamp set that I colored in with Tombows. I used My Mind's Eye Lost & Found 2 paper. I used a Fiskars "Swiss Dots" punch along the bottom, then I added some vintage lace, hatpins, and a Ivory Ribbon from Flourishes.
Pretty cute right? It looks super autumn inspired and can carry very well into winter time. I plan on making about 2 more to go with this twiggy guy for our dining table and a couple others for our coffee table.
Did I just find the handle from a roman amphora and the rim of a vessel?
The mourners are here.
other people treat them.”
Jokes apart I am good without God. I said as we neared the gate of our building. I am in awe of the universe itself, and very grateful to be a part of it. That is enough..When will we grow up and be cured of this illness of our unfounded belief in religion and face the real tragedies and pleasures of life?
Have been talking to myself that wont stay long in this company, should be less than a year, but 3 more weeks will be my 1 year service with this company; resign within a year need to give 1 month notice, after 1 year service, 2 months are required.
James LeGros (Living in Oblivion)
Many questions arise. Why did Aaron respond when Moses was apparently angry at Eleazar and Ithamar? Did Aaron do anything wrong? Or was it Eleazar and Ithamar? If Aaron couldn’t eat the sin offering for whatever reason then why didn’t Eleazar and Ithamar?
If you like cheese, and especially grilled cheese, give it a try and check out her site..
me and my friend Wendy!
It consisted of a horses skull covered with a white sheet and decorated with colourful ribbons, which was carried by a man concealed under the sheet who could operate the jaw and make it snap.
He also produced the Sex Pistols first demos in May of '76.
Please join us Thursday, March 8th through Saturday, March 10th anytime between 11am and 4pm to celebrate. We’ll be serving up plenty of delicious goodies.
Paper: Yoyo Yellow, Green Galore, Whisper White Card Stock and Loves Me Vellum
(2) Lucky Star
“We have two options now. We dig in, deep, into what she did that morning, and hunt down any leads we come up with. But that also brings those leads in danger, I have this feeling this killer-maniac has dried up of information and is waiting for something to happen. Or more dead bodies would have been dropping….. Damn! One morning I leave her unobserved and all this starts!” Karan sat thinking.
When I saw the sketch I wanted to do something different than the top note die. I decided to use punched flowers for the top note die element. The colors were perfect for the punched flowers. Here is my interpretation of the challenges.
I have worked on several other pieces since then. Two of them are watercolor landscapes that I think turned out fairly well.
“The file was kept off the premises but Pert told Sharp he needed it to fix a corrupt file. Pert then wiped it, as well as two other backups in two fire safes on the premises.”
By the way, I am re-reading Pollyanna, the novel. I will, of course, work on a structured, somewhat intelligent book review when I am finished but only after I write the other one that I was intending to write first. I have a beautiful new writing tool that I am obsessing over because it might reign over the chaos that is the screenplay. Oh my goodness, I am totally in love with a computer program! I feel I have awakened a sleeping giant. The screenplay has gotten so fat and chunky over this last year, I think it is about to spring up and leap away! Again, the beauty of potential!
and honked an apology to me with a long blast of his horn.
Another change, noted by Rotacidare on the EQ2-Daily podcast, is location experience. There is now a ton of it in DFC. You want to poke your nose into every room you see, as the vast majority will reward you with a discovery event. I made a level and a half of AA experience on that alone. That includes all the doors in the courtyard. DFC is now a discovery rich environment.
I may not know the full story behind my trials, my sagas in life . . . just as some of the other biblical characters didn't know theirs, but there are a few things I do know:
Well last night a read a book about how free will is an illusion and we are all actually making decisions based on our genes, our upbringing, our life to this point, so therefore we are really not in control of our actions. Not sure I believe everything I read but the author made nice logical arguments. But am I really in control of my life? Of my decisions?
Turkey is blue too.
2. Delivery, delivery, delivery. You need to sound real. If you’re claiming to have a complaint, for example, then your voice must sound like the voice of a person with a complaint, not like the voice of a stoner boy trying to make a prank call.
Since, as I understand it (and I'm relying on well informed readers who may wish to remain anonymous to correct me if necessary) the Government have still to respond to the outline proposals, I'm not sure that it's simply the workload of actuaries (and others) which means that " it is therefore not yet possible to produce final proposals."
Cut tortillas into strips. Dip in chicken broth to soften. Combine chicken, onion, and pepper. Mix soups and Rotel tomatoes,green chiles and Chipotle corn; add chicken mixture. In a 13 x 9 x 2 inch buttered casserole dish, alternately layer the tortillas, chicken soup mixture, and grated cheese. Repeat, ending with cheese. Bake at 350 degrees for 30 to 40 minutes. May be prepared ahead of time and frozen or refrigerated.
Nintendo’s online network remains the laughing stock, the ugly duckling of online networks. Nintendo is looking to change this with WiiU and 3DS. As such Nintendo does not want to take risks they want to have sure things to launch not a gamble.
Closer look at the flower detail and border die, as you can see I've edged my flowers and pins with a hint of white acrylic paint too and added some gorgeous lace I've had in my stash a while, along with the cute little charm,
Vanity.
Matthew 21:1-9
Synthesizer - Eno* , Moebius*
By saying that there is only one reality—material reality—even when you imbue matter with spirituality, because you are still dealing with only one level, you are ignoring the transcendent level. And therefore you are only looking at half of the pie; you are ignoring the other half. Ken Wilber makes this point very, very well. So what has to be done of course—and that’s when the stigma of science disappears—is to include the other half into science. Now, before my work, I think it was very obscure how this inclusion has to be done. Although people like Teilhard de Chardin, Aurobindo or Madame Blavatsky, the founder of the Theosophy movement, recognized that such a science could have come, very few could actually see it.
These kinds of problems were found during the review process. Some could be considered serious violations warranting disciplinary action; others fall into a gray area where officers feel they should be allowed to exercise discretion. Officers:
Let’s sum up a lot of this by saying we hit things off perfectly. In all honesty, our relationship was pretty much physical. We did the date thing and went out to dinner, but neither of us were exactly interested in this portion of the evenings we spent together. I can say without a doubt, he was the best lover I’d ever had. He still holds that record too.
“We have no voice. We have no visibility… And I am telling you, this is why women’s rights should be institutionalised, it should not be held hostage at the hand of political leaderships who can change in a second, right? Governments should be held responsible for treating men and women equally.”
I knew there was a mirror inside, but I couldn't open the box right away - and I couldn't hold back. My hands covered my face and I just started crying.
Trying to be extra safe, I pulled out to cum into the condom, and that was that. Her virginity was mine! This story would eventually go on to baffle MissMass–that a virgin vagina could actually handle me (upcoming story). I guess all that fingering paid off.
YKCAI Blog (ykcaiblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
This maintains flexibility to act to ether build the school or maintain the present capital infrastructure. There is no economic disadvantage to this purchase as it was contemplated in the Board’s Education Development Charges By-law passes in June 2009.
In answer to the question what are scenarios. – “They are an art-form, based on facts. A good scenario is a garble. A bad one is a bungle. They need not be plausible, only hypnotic, like good art.”
As the Chosun Daily claims, South Korea needs China’s trade more than China needs Korea’s: “China is the biggest market for Korean exports, accounting for 30 percent of outbound shipments, but Korea takes up only 4 percent of China’s exports.”
Lay the halved strawberries on top of the biscuit base.
Iraqi activists said this unnamed teenager was brutally killed by religious police for having an ‘emo’ hairstyle
He was in the hospital for months. A ruptured spleen, countless broken bones, a collapsed lung. He would miss the rest of the school year, but he would live. “I heard she was driving too fast.” “The children weren’t supposed to be walking home that way.” “I heard she swerved to miss Trish.” The women of the neighborhood whispered in clusters on the curbs of our street.
My first thought, like I’m sure many other have thought, was “why is this happening?” But then I remembered what someone in similar situation said once before, that God trusted me enough to carry one of His little babys, even if it was only for a short time, and that alone should remove my despair. That’s not to say I’m not sad. Emotionally, I’m spent right now – I just wish I could crawl in bed and sleep for a while, but life must still go on and I still have two of the sweetest little girls in the world who need me to be there for them.
He went up to talk to her. Feeling confident. Well, you know because he was an actor; a child star, turned nobody, then turned into a sort of somebody again, thanks to a little Indie film called Potential Friends. And then there was The Uncle, a horror film. He wasn't a household name, or face. But people seemed to recognize him every so often.
Julie M.
Every now and then without warning
Chuck Higgins – in 2001
8) Lawnmowers. This is inevitable, like death or bad bowel movements. Or blog posts like this one with references to bad bowel movements. Usually, the first mowers go off about April 1 even though the lawns aren't even green. Then come leaf blowers and edgers for 6 months. Then comes the cRaZy blogger.
I am a bit of a hermit when I write, which is no surprise really, since I am a hermit when I illustrate, too. I read an early version of THE BLACKHOPE ENIGMA aloud for my husband, and he gave me helpful comments, but otherwise I only showed it to my agent. I made a conscious decision, for good or ill, to keep the story to myself. In part, I think I was just a bit shy about it, but I also didn’t want to get too many outside opinions. When I began getting feedback from children who had read advance copies, I was bowled over by their positive response, and glad that at last the story was out there for all to read.
I’m learning to breathe again, walk again, laugh again, feel again
My advice: Welcome your “bad” ideas. They are your friends. Treat them with the love and respect they deserve.
But always the depraved bark
The world is big, and we're constantly learning. Sometimes the learning happens when you're alone, sometimes with just one other person, sometimes in a large group. These are just a few ways that unschoolers can and do find knowledge and learning:
“How do you know she’s the one, Harold?”
While I'm enjoying the quilting seminar this week, I thought I'd share with you what I brought along for Show and Tell.
Tough guy private eye Joe Mannix (Mike Connors) follows a lady into a club and gets into a sock on the jaw. While Mannix is lying dazed, the artist onstage—Neil Diamond, interrupted during a performance of "Raisin' Cain"—asks, "Hey, man, do you mind if I finish the set myself?" (Other musical appearances on Mannix included Buffalo Springfield and The Peppermint Trolley Company.)
grilled asparagus with lemon zest
Alex hasn't woken up at all during the past two nights, which I believe is only the second or third time we've had two consecutive no-wake nights since his birth. When you consider all the crying Alex did by waking up every two hours, the total amount of sleep-related crying is a fraction of what it was.
Along the way, Persimmon undergoes the trials of love, heartbreak, doubt and the discovery of her own true value.
So now join me in welcoming some new bloggers. They are marked with asterisks. Go check them out.
It was then that she heard Nixon buy it. Seven remained in her pitiful group, but they didn’t stop to mourn, regroup, and then call down the wrath of the heavens upon their tormentors.
As I write about new Clash, I feel better about it honestly. Maybe that would change if I sat down and watched it again, as I felt irritated upon watching it this weekend, but especially for people not super familiar with the original, new Clash is fun. If you can leave your notions at the door, you can enjoy it more than I did certainly.
Recognize that? Yeah…
Besides: Isn't that the kind of pressure that actual journalists have to deal with day-in and day-out? (Hey: If I can pull this off, anyone want to hire me to cover film festivals full time? Anyone?)
Earlier this year Masing spoke of his determination to ‘alienate’ double the number of native customary lands from 1 million hectares to 2 million hectares over the coming few years.
- 1 point for every time the combination is used. (i.e. jar, lear, pear, bark, arm, etc.)
It was a fantastic day and one that I would definitely recommend to anyone wanting to do something that bit special for a loved one-departures are in different areas of the UK, we went on the Pullman from Victoria in London.
Apparently, some years ago, someone said, 'Try everything once except incest and morris dancing'. Now, I had always thought that it was conductor Sir Thomas Beecham, until I discovered that he had said 'folk dancing'. After a wander through the halls of cyberspace, it appears that this phrase, or something like it, has (allegedly)been uttered by a good many people over the years. Politicians (Sir Winston Churchill); Writers (Oscar Wilde, George Bernard Shaw); Renaissance men (Stephen Fry); actors (Woody Allen); philosophers (Bertrand Russell); composers (Sir Arnold Bax); all seem to have got in on the act. And even the 'model' Linzi Drew used the phrase as the title of her autobiography. You'll probably be pleased to hear that I've only ignored half of the advice given me by this positive gallimaufry of personalities.
"I received a call right before I met you downstairs. Apparently, they didn't do a completely thorough investigation. When they probed deeper into the worm bed, they hit something soft. A man has surfaced. They're on their way with him right now. And he doesn't have arms."
1. Lost
It's taken me a lonnnnnnng time to muster up the courage to write this post, well...with all that we went through last September I don't think there's many out there that would blame me. But, it's time to share the latest good news from the Reese family. Because if you can't share it with good friends and family, who can you share it with? Plus it's already "Facebook official", so this seems more like an afterthought with that previous declaration. Ha! But I promise you, it's not. As I type this (as well as when I posted on FB), my hands are shaking and my heartbeat is starting to pick up. Why be nervous?! Geez.
” I am sure, you wont come back again, so I am not leaving you right now.”
The Saragossa Manuscript (Wojciech Has, 1965) - "The film nests stories within stories within stories, erecting complex structures that burrow further and further away from reality, into the past, into ghost stories and tales of demons and devils and, especially, stories of love and romantic scheming. The film's text repeatedly comments, self-reflexively, on all these metafictional layers... The layered structure contributes to the sensation of being haunted, of passing from one absurd situation to another while losing one's grip on concrete reality."
Milton
The tragic events that took you away,
History was made today with the largest lottery jackpot ever. It’s estimated to stand at $640m (although it is most likely more by now). The payout will be about $20m a year for the next 26 years or you could take a cash option of $462m. The IRS (Internal Revenue Service) stands to make $100m in tax.
While a misty, 50-degree day may be good for stomping around the Irish countryside or staying inside with hot tea and a sweater and a good book, it's definitely not playing-the-harp-outdoors weather. Especially not the Lyon & Healy, which I needed to play because the soloist would be singing the Malotte "Lord's Prayer."
Writing is drawing the essence of what we know out of the shadows. That is what writing is about. Not what happens there, not what actions are played out there, but the there itself. There, that is writing's location and aim. But how to get there?
opening ceremony, chaired by
This church cannot come alive without money.
LANSING, Mich. – Michigan Supreme Court Justice Mary Beth Kelly and Michigan Department of Human Services Director Maura D. Corrigan have urged legislators to approve bills before both chambers that will streamline the adoption process for children in foster care. The passage of these bills could pave the way for expedited placement in qualified, permanent homes for more than 1,100 children.
And, just to be clear, I do NOT have kids... I love cartoons!
It is estimated that, approximately 2% of the betting public in the UK and Ireland make a profit from horse racing which is quite concerning, so it’s important to find a product that gives you a good return on a consistent basis and the Sprint Lay Expert certainly doesn’t disappoint in that department.
“People are looking forward, ahead. There is a buzz. For people that don’t understand what’s happening here, this is just great,” said Robert Harbick, Marinette Mayor.
4. Jamaica Farewell
There are two approaches to street photography. You can stop people and ask them or you can document life as it happens in front of you - sometimes shooting from the hip. I do both.
The grove, together with its roots, is a dynamic process, constantly animated and controlled by private and public language. For language to function, we need it all.
Unfortunately, one of the fun things about being bipolar is that we often feel things we do not want to feel but they stick in our minds disproportionately magnified until they dominate our thoughts. We second guess everything we do or say and play it over and over in our heads ad infinitem. And if someone drops the guilt bomb on us, or we do it to ourselves, we find ourselves in a web of mixed emotions from which not even Spiderman can untangle. If you are bipolar, it’s very hard to simply chose not to feel that kind of guilt no matter how justified.
D.S.'s goals include to "abolish private ownership of the means of production", increase progressive taxation, promote gun control, introduce socialized health care in every state and gradually turn the U.S. into a socialist country.
Oklahoma State Penitentiary death row inmate Michael Bascum Selsor, 57, is set to be executed today at 6 p.m. in the prison’s death chamber.
Leave a separate entry for each:
Elvis Presley had millions of fans – she was among the most faithful. She saw every movie he made, and listened to his recordings over and over. A high point in her life was visiting Graceland; another high point was when her granddaughter became an Elvis fan.
62. I'm Not Her Janet Gurtler
A wood haven
We hear a lot of really whacky comments from people who are understandably upset about dog attacks, but don't really have all the facts as they relate to the Pit Bull breed and dog bites in general. Here, we tackle some of those comments.....and offer some easy, sane responses up in exchange.
Do you have a fringe bathing suit? What's your favorite type/trend of bathing suit for summer?
"We were asked not to disclose that," Thomas said. "But we were pleased we could provide them with a healthy lunch."
“挫逼” is a derogatory word commonly used in mainland China for cursing people, an equivalent of the Hokkien phrase ‘CCB’ commonly used as a vulgarity in Singapore to refer to the female sexual organ.
So I made this
Despite claims by national republicans and current MA Senator Scott Brown that Warren’s ties to the Occupy movement is a sign of her ‘extremist leanings’ her campaign hasn’t backed down.. “She understands why people are so angry and why they are taking the fight to the street,” her spokesperson told the Washington Post and the candidate herself has taken credit for “much of the intellectual foundation” of the movement.
After a silence Krishnamurti said quietly, “Then you are a religious person. Then stillness comes. Completely still.”
“We burned down the thatched huts, starting the blaze with Ronson and Zippo lighters,” Powell recalled. “Why were we torching houses and destroying crops? Ho Chi Minh had said the people were like the sea in which his guerrillas swam. …
A few days ago I paid a visit to my cousin brother. This cousin of mine has two cats and a dog, his parents and his paternal grandparents and a full time maid in his house. The time I chose to turn up at his doorstep was the lunch hour and as I stepped into the living room, I found the entire family squeezed into the hapless couch with the maid and the pets on the rug, all in a line, with their plates sitting agape in front of the television. It was funny how not even the cats stirred a minute from their place. This was a revelation of how most of the urban households spend their spare time. And evidently, the fact that TV kills glial cells is not enough to move them from their couches. Not that I am averse to television but I wonder what form of education do the people who say that TV is educational, receive. Groucho Marx can be conveniently quoted here, “I find television very educating. Every time somebody turns on the set, I go into the other room and read a book.” People are missing out on a lot with every second that they exhaust with their televisions like exercise, fresh air and daylight for example.
So yeah, with all of these distractions I haven't been a very good food blogger lately. I promise to work on that. But in the meantime, I have TWO giveaways coming up this month! TWO! Stay tuned for the details and I might even try to cook something to share with ya'll in the meantime.
Like Martin’s scheme, the devil is in the details of our ABO plan. For many of us, it’ll require re-joining a discredited party we left in disgust. However emotionally or ethically unsettling, it’s physically easy.
But THIS was the book that was in there:
The Dark Tower series by Stephen King--read 3 out of 8 (series finished?) Roland, the last gunslinger, and his quest for the Dark Tower.
Days have highs and lows. Everything reminds me of him and of what could have been. I should be spending my days with Laurie, my nephews and my Mom. All hanging around, watching our kids. We would have been thinking about trying to get pregnant again. Jacob would have been pulling himself up by now, maybe even walking. Ted and I spent some time at Laurie's today. We had a good time. Jacob was missing, as always, as were August, Cub and the Twins. Ben was fun and we had fun playing games and I held Danny a lot. Ted later told me that it was really hard for him to see me with the baby, that I looked so good and so natural holding him and interacting with him and it made him really sad. He has felt really down every since.
A tv program (Oregon Field Guide? I think) is here to do a documentary-style show on paragliding. There was talk this morning of the tv crew wanting to fly the race on tandem while filming and explaining how it works, strategy, etc. I had forgotten all about it until landing at goal. After touching down & walking towards the other pilots packing up, one of my friends recognized me & started cheering. I let out a "woohoo! first time at goal!" and as I turned to put my wing down there was a tv camera in my face. So embarrassing, especially when they interviewed me right away & I was babbling a million miles a minute. But still cool that my first time in goal is well documented.
-I'm soooo confused..twittered Miss Moussie with a sigh....I'm ever so confused....
Happy and Merry
“’The first one will get you.’ According to John R., he kept repeating that.” DR. BOB and the Good Oldtimers, page 227.
I like to think of myself as your normal 18 year old. I shop, I like boys, and I enjoy the company of some of the people at my university. I'm confused and also a bit scared at what the world has to throw at me in the future. I wish it was simple enough to say that I believed I was ready for what may come to me next, but I'm far from it. I haven't had a job in over six months and the money I had stashed away in my bank account is quickly diminishing. My current major is psychology, but who knows if that is what is going to stay stationed at. And as of recently, I've become curious as to if I would ever find someone who cares about me.
How old are you now?
Gravy - Again, every family has their favourite gravy. I will share my recipe with you but do use your own. Most can be made in about 10 minutes
Dougie and Bryan have kindly offered guest posts, but I'm still a couple short, so if anyone wants to guest post and can get it to me by tea-time tonight (UK time), I will love you eternally and maybe even let you peel my sunburn. Just email me it if you can/want to.
Deb :)
Micro Chip Clinic - $30.00 includes registration
At least 3 inches.
A few weeks ago, I found myself standing outside a Bozeman bar at dusk, a file of topo maps tucked under one arm. I’m not the kind of person who hangs around bars (the file of maps should be a clue; I’ve discerned that these are not a usual drinking accessory) but I was waiting to meet Gregg Treinish, the founder and director of Adventurers and Scientists for Conservation (ASC), an NGO whose name alone intrigued me enough to venture out into the introvert-unfriendly universe of college-town drinking establishments. Gregg’s credential as a National Geographic Adventurer of the Year was intimidating, but when he showed up and spent the first fifteen minutes of our conversation talking about how inspiring he finds wolverines, I figured we were on equal footing in at least one respect. This was fortunate, since a mutual friend had contacted me in January to talk about putting together an exciting, wolverine-related adventure with Gregg and a few other people, and I wasn’t really prepared to spend time in the remote backcountry with someone who intimidated me with his athleticism. An athletic individual committed to wolverines, however – I could deal with that.
+this Blueberry Breakfast Cake looks too delicious not to try. Yes, I have a thing for breakfast casseroles...Sunday brunch anyone?
Looking divine.
Now, I have consistently brought up sex with them and with their older brother who now lives on his own with a gaggle of twenty something young men in West Oakland. And I have consistently been rebuffed, scoffed at, silenced by their stares, punctuated with a rolling of the eyes or a sigh of exhaustion.
(Seriously? Who eats a salad for breakfast - me, that's who.)
Once we teleported inside, I went to stab the thing with Daystar but the sodding thing dodged it, while I was invisible. Inconceivable. No matter though, Greyrat was quick to dominate his mind like a puppet master, which brought about a round of interrogation with someone forced to talk to us. I was so disappointed. No torture, no breaking finger bones, no suffocation, no sleep deprivation, no fun. At least it was quick. We found out that Vhalantru hired Gortio the doppelganger a few years back to do some work, and with a wicked sense of humor, used a ritual to bind the soul of a demon to Gortio. Currently Vhalantru, as Gortio explained, was in Oblivion attempting to do the same thing to himself but with a more powerful demon. Moron. I mean really, why bind your soul to a demon? The side effects, as Gortio displayed, would be just bad. I say just go find a succubus and a warm bed. So much more fun unless you get the filth, and then it isn’t so much fun.
LaShawana Johnson, 27, New York, N.Y.
Some of you may know my old blog called Momo's World.
My universe is oh so different from a young girl living in Sudan or Pakistan, Yet, because we share the same planet at the same time, we once and a while are effected by someones universe or reality on the other side of the planet. Wether it be man made like the Fukushima Nuclear Plant disaster or a natural disaster like volcano erupting mega-tons of ash and gas and debris high up into our atmosphere or atmospheric warming, we at any moment can be living with the same mandates.
This might be my favorite muffin recipe because I can make it even if I don’t have any good fresh fruit or vegetables to throw in, plus it’s really easy to adapt. (This one is also lower in fat than the first two because it doesn’t contain butter. Not that I have anything against butter, and you could certainly add some if you want to make these extra moist. Or, you could just butter them afterwards like Micah always does.)
I had some fun shooting monochromatic images. To a newbie they’re certainly easier than polychromatic ones since you need only worry about the brightness/contrast ratio as opposed to the hue and saturation.
On may 1,2011 ,Mr Obama gave the green light to our brave marines to take out the savage murderer ,the founder of the notorious terrorist network AL QAEDA (the base)Usama Bin Laden ( the product of Saudi Arabia)who was the brain behind the bloody terrorist attack on America,in September 11,2001.The hateful attack killed more than three thousand innocent people ,American and citizens of other countries.17 out of the 19 terrorist were Saudis,the country which America protects and defends .If it wasn’t for our former president Mr, George Bush the father who lead the world in the Gulf war,the Arab Gulf States ,would if been under the mercy of Saddam Hussein the butcher of Baghdad.How fast those Arabs forgot our kindness?
Mr Len McCluskey the appointed leader of the Unite union whose annual salary in excess of £130,000 plus allowances, plus tax-free perks and living quarters, plus a gold-plated pension tells us on a regular basis that he is at war!
04/28/2012
I just don't want to leave without her.
Good. Fuck off and don't come back.
The fact of the matter, that white nationalists are either unwilling or unable to address, is that white people are their own worst enemy.The whole article is worth reading. Read it here. There is much more to why White Nationalism is problematic.
2 large cooking apples
Had to share these cousin pics. Mine are asking for another baby in the family.
After they are processed our tomato seeds are placed on screens for a couple days until thoroughly dry. These seeds can easily last over ten years if stored properly - cool, dry, dark environment.
I am blessed. I've been lucky to be able share my love for the game of baseball with my son. Wondrously, during the hundreds of games we have attended and watched together I've been able to witness him fall in love with the game too. In a way, I am jealous of him because he has literally has grown up going to the ballpark. His is an era where availability and access to the game was unheard of in my day.
When the sun pulled up over the top of the forest, they set off again. Higher and higher they climbed, past the heathers and rodenty goodness hiding underneath and towards the impossibly high, bare and rocky Mount Doom.
Because the Earth is a spheroid, a constructive plate margin cannot extend at the same speed at all latitudes, therefore constructive margins also have a whole load of transform strike-slip faults which allow the ridge to offset, and accommodate variable spreading rates. There’s an example of these from the Mid Atlantic Ridge shown below. These things, once formed, remain as weaknesses in the oceanic crust throughout its lifecycle.
In this discussion, the Mosaic covenant is actually viewed as the new one, being preceded by a covenantal “promise” of blessing made to Abraham. The law actually seemed to work at cross-​purposes to this promise, bringing cursing rather than blessing, death rather than life. It was “added” (lit: “came alongside”), for disciplinary reasons, until the ordained recipient of the promise actually came into the world — Christ.
* pepper
I grabbed her arms. “Only if you tell me about what happened to her. I know Sal did something to her. Maybe worse than what he has done to you.” I said as I stared into her baggy eyes.
Now it has little Sebastion,
or exploiting its reputation as
Whenever I need to destress a bit,
Onto My Day:
Feels good to know about the real pulpy deal, right? C’mon show me a smile on the comment box, and you might win yourself a Really Pulpy Deal! (That’s a chance to win a Minute Maid gift pack simply by commenting. Sweet! C'mon you just might be picked as the lucky 'commentor'!)
From time to time, I've scanned travel guides for French visitors to the U.S., and I've even spent some time lurking in a few on-line travel forums where the French pose their pressing questions about U.S. travel. I thought there might be a post in it but, since most of the questions appear to be about how best to structure a three week RV vacation in the great American West, something I've never done or even contemplated, I pretty much dropped the idea. I mean, I'd like to see the Grand Canyon sometime (although preferably not from the window of a Winnebago) but I'll leave that to another time and place.
Psalm 34:19-20… “Many are the afflictions of the righteous: but the LORD delivereth him out of them all. He keepeth all his bones: not one of them is broken” (KJV). Yes, there are many afflictions… Protection is seen here… Keeping you from all harm is seen here… God can deliver you out of all of them. He keeps your physical being intact. God is concerned with your whole being. One of my daily prayers is “Thank you Lord for keeping me safe physically, spiritually, mentally, and emotionally.”
my limbs wicking at the window.
1 garlic clove, miced
He climbed out of the crib the other morning so we had to lower the mattress.
He says the fishing has been nearly as good as it was back in the eighties: the best fishing ever on Lake Michigan.
But you act like you don’t care
Rep. Jan Schakowsky (D-IL) Admits Obama Healthcare Plan Will Destroy Insurance Industry:
I started a new painting today. I’m not certain what I’ll call it but I’ve settled with “Androgyne” as a working title.
I am grown and…I shouldn’t be thinking of getting a present each day, celebrating the climactic countdown to the most wonderful day of the year!
Allister: I really don't know, love gained and love lost I suppose.
Easter weekend was cold and rainy,
The benefits of having online partners can be great. You can multiply your efforts and mutually enhance each other’s success. You can offer a more compelling value to your community. You can benefit by associating with a partner, sharing in each other’s prestige and reputation. Perhaps more importantly, by partnering with a larger or more established online business, you can reinforce your own legitimacy and community standing.
Zubehör/Embellishments: Dekoteile aus Holz, Offray Ribbon, Jute String
There are so many different social networking blogs around the internet and more are being created all the time. Some of the popular blogging sites are WordPress, Blogger, Tumblr, Weebly, LiveJournal and Soulcast. Even larger social networking sites like MySpace have the option of blogging within your account, which allows you to use their website a big part of a business marketing plan. With these social websites you can reach out to existing and new customers within the networking community.
As publishers embark on digital strategies, they must act to ensure that their brand is maintained lest third parties ambush their offering and disguise it as their own. Publishers need to be brave: to know what they stand for, who they are, why they exist. And then they need to assert this personality lest, like shy teenagers, they are left to stand around the edge of the dance hall, unobserved, desperate and aloof.
I can’t believe I did see it.
orange-juiceamniotic-fluidorange-juiceamniotic-fluid
The subjects of pessimism and optimism have always interested me. I enjoyed G.K. Chesterson's take on the matter when I found it in his "Orthodoxy." The first paragraph of the sample below may not seem to be all that important, but if you go back and re-read it after digesting the whole thing you might appreciate the analogies a little more. The second paragraph gives me hope that my occasional feelings of being in the wrong place at the wrong time are not causes for despair but are indeed indicators of the joy we have in Christ.
Please note the following situations when it is NOT appropriate to say ANY of these phrases, I know from personal experience:
Patterned papers: My Mind's Eye
Batch size: 5.5 gal
I'll give you a clue then - it was probably the Madrid railway bombings in 2004. Of course, there have been many other attacks and planned attacks in Europe before and since.
Here’s what I made:
1. Crafty Cardmakers has a recipe challenge. Use 1 image, 2 background papers, 3 embellishments -must include 1 heart. My stamped image is my flower-my 2nd bg paper is on my envelope and also on my flower image. Embellishments: I used pearls, a punched and stamped heart, and ribbon and lace.
Challenge Issues: There are some touchy moments (the near rape of Beetle by drunken boys, the midwife’s affair with the baker, the well described births) that might make the squeamish (or their parents) uncomfortable. But all are delivered in an honest, realistic way. The birth scenes were especially graphic. In another disturbing scene, a cat is tied into a sack and thrown in the river by some boys.
May tree also stands not only for Spring but for LOVE! The story goes that if a young boy/man likes another girl/woman he will decorate a tree with colored ribbons and the like and then he will put it on the top of her roof in the middle of the night before May 1st as a surprise. The dude then leaves it up for one month and when he returns to take it down, if the girl likes him back, she will invite him to dinner, give him a cake, a case of beer, or if he’s reallllllly lucky – a kiss.
Until next time, take care of yourselves. And each other.
Yahweh had instituted the Passover, which beautifully represents the Atonement – At-one-ment. This means that through the blood of the lamb that was posted on the doors on the night to be much observed (remembered and celebrated) the first-born Israelite might be saved from the great death that went through all the land of Egypt. It was this night that brought the dawn of a new day.
Yes, as many already know, I made it safely back without any great problems. Both flights were a few minutes late, but that was all, nothing to drive me to frustration this time around, thank goodness.
I haven’t done much traveling around since returning from Munich, but the upcoming weeks are going to be ridiculously busy for me, including a day tour of some beautiful castles on the borders, and trips to visit friends in Newcastle (England), Munich & Salzburg, then Dublin for Thanksgiving! I also just made plans to visit my family in Norway for the Christmas holidays, which I couldn’t be more excited about. In short though, this means that I think I will finally be busy enough to be feeling the pressure in school! I have three essays to do this semester and a test coming up in my Islam class on Halloween. The fun all begins next week, so hopefully I’ll have some great stories to share soon.
Yummy colors, yes? I think it would make an amazing treasure chest or memory box, and the black frame around the top will be lettered with inspiring phrases. I'll post pics here and on facebook when it's finished. :)
Who should church leaders please? They should please the ones with money and power, of course! (sarcasm)
Anyway, exercise lasts until 3 to 3:30. Shower until 4pm. (Yes, assholes. I shower. I know you couldn’t tell by the animated stink lines that waft from my matted hair, but it’s true. I’m not that big of a hippy.)
Using the back of a large spoon, squeeze as many of the remaining vegetables through the sieve as you can – the red pepper and the sweet potato will give the soup great color and flavor, as will the roots, leeks and carrot (I usually take a few pieces of carrot to kvetch through into the soup for the flavor).
verte como no verte.
Looking at this set, I've realised something. That while Scottish brewers were renowned for their Strong Ales, they didn't make Stouts of any great strength. The strongest I've found so far was 1078º. That's barely a Double Stout by London standards. There were plenty of London Stouts that were 1090º and above.
I recently went and visited my parents for the Easter break. It was great to escape the big city for the slower pace of the seaside town where they live. It’s just a pity that half of Sydney seemed to have a similar idea. But I was able to use my time away to do some reading (five-hour bus trips were made for this).
What is the understanding then? After a hypothetical chapter, I come to the conclusion that the tentacle as a boneless limb to catch prey resembles fractals. Fractal geometry will be soon brought into light of science by Benoît Mandelbrot and others. Fractals are shapes evolving from random numbers and other bits of information, thus forming patterns out of ‘white noise’. Tentacles, and this is my insane assumption, show the movement of spaces beyond normal geometry of triangles, cones, rectangles and cubes. The flabbering movement can be read as a sign for vibrant transgression between two levels of reality. I would have liked that Lovecraft has followed this idea, but I fear that although he has his flaws, he was the better writer not to impose such ideas on the reader.
F7 Bb Bmaj7 Gm7 C7 F
After having the blindfold of the first 2/3rds of the book removed I’m itching for the next book in the series! That last third simultaneously opened up lots of knowledge and lots of questions. If you’re looking for a paranormal (minus vampires) you’ve found a very nice option with this book.
After several months of hard work – and more than one moment when my laptop was in serious danger of being given a nice hot bubble bath – I have written a query that works. I've gotten requests for the full, one of which is in the hands of my dream agent (not that your own sharky self would not also be a dream agent. It's just that my work is not your cup o'chum.)
About 40 shutter clicks later, I captured this beauty using the natural light as it filtered into the window:
THAT'S it. that IS the recipe. I Kid you not.
I'm not sure I even want 72 virgins. I think maybe 4 or 5 virgins, and the rest very warm, loving women.
HIS MERCY,…
Tower in the Park Design?
The talented author-illustrator's latest creation is There Goes Ted Williams: The Greatest Hitter Who Ever Lived (Candlewick Press). I'm thankful to Matt, who agreed to share his own history as a fan and occasional collector.
So today has been quite a day. A lot has happened, considering I have only been awake for a few hours here and there, I’m not completely sure it all really happened. Lol
I also played with more fabric and made a second husky mat for my client. I like these fabric choices better than the ones I used last week.
I started with a simple patchwork center, made mainly from 30's prints (Hope Chest fabrics from Connecting Threads and other stash) and then added a wide white border, which I scalloped. It was my first time ever scalloping edges and I love the look! The process wasn't too bad, either. I started by watching this tutorial. I didn't want to order their special gadget for scalloping, so I used a plate and a water soluable marker and pins. A little marking and remarking the curves before cutting, and I was good to go. The results ended up pretty dandy! The edges are bound with bias binding. It's roughly a twin size, but I made it so it could also double as a table topper for her dining room table. Or it can be used as a lap quilt, too. Gotta love having so many options!
KC A little key board and drums.
I believe we were the one that made her famous first by posting that the Tea Party copied her idea in a post I called "Tea Party Thieves?", after that the media, including Stephen Colbert, picked up on her other post. Anyone that disputes it is in denial. :7p
We're nothing more than another land mass with over 200-million dumb-as-sheep sheople willing to be led around by the nose while they (Muslims) take over and enslave "all non-believers" as their roll of toilet paper disguised as a holy book (Koran) instructs.
As I sit down to write...especially when it is a story that doesn't fall under the "Every thing's Coming Up Roses" category nor puts me in the most flattering of lights...I still do not hesitate to bring you these tales in the hope that you will see that God can truly use a mommy that is flawed, yet has a hungry heart for Jesus and still has the confidence and security in HIM to lay it all out there in the hope that it could help someone in some small way.
Greg Prestopino
Like beer, the character of fruit is dependent on the moment and circumstances you eat it. At its best, fruit is eaten right off the tree, warmed by the hot summer sun, so juicy it falls into your hand. The flesh of the fruit eaten in these conditions is almost liquid and suffused with intense aroma and flavor. When I was served a goblet of Ron Gansberg's Apricot Ale, it had captured this quality of the apricot. From the aroma, which was so fresh you could almost smell the summer breeze in the orchard, to the flavor, which captured the evanescent quality of fresh fruit nectar.
She asked if she could have some flour.
We've all heard the saying "Friend or Foe", right? Well, I've had the "pleasure" of finding out truly who my FRIENDS are versus my FOES.
APOLLO
Meanwhile, I get up to go to the bathroom and go to wash my hands and someone left a huge mess on the sink and I end up drenching my shirt. Then I go to make a copy and we're out of paper. Then my manager calls me in his office and says that my client called him and he proceeds to start yelling at me. Then I spill coffee on my shirt. Then the fax machine jams while I'm trying to fax 27 pages. And then the client calls back and apologizes for yelling at me, and then proceeds to start yelling at me again. I take my lunch break and put my Lean Cuisine in the microwave for the time the box tells me to and it's still partially frozen. I go back to my desk and my pen runs out of ink. Then I'm in the middle of a project and try to save my Excel spreadsheet and my computer crashes and loses all my work. Then my boyfriend calls and says the landscaper we hired still hasn't shown up and he's three hours late. So I call him, he answers, and at the end of the conversation, he calls me a f-ing bitch and slams down the phone.
The Commission’s first conditional approval was passed in April of 2010 and capped the project at $2.4 billion, among other restrictions. The second order, passed approximately one month later, limits the plant’s cost overruns to $2.88 billion and also allows the utility to charge customers for financing costs before the plant becomes operational.
Anyway, we got the darn laundry done and laid low for the rest of the evening. Despite all the water and flushing, the black water tank is still not emptying as it should. I'll tackle this at a later date, and hopefully a little smarter next time...
Now it's time to hook Ms. Bella up for her last feed of the day...oh man I wish that little girl would eat some food
2. Comments. How do I feel about comments? Share away. Occasionally I will be posing questions in my posts in the off chance you may know more than I do. Gasp.
Merry Christmas from Susie at sptp
6 ounces extra shredded sharp cheddar cheese (1 1/2 cups), divided (or Dragon Ale mustard cheese if you have it)
3) Plan on getting everyone up 15 minutes early and divide up chores to make sure the house is in show condition when you leave. These things include loading breakfast dishes into the dishwasher, making beds, picking up bath towels and clothes, and making sure the trash is empty.
I can't imagine any sane person telling any of the first three Marys any of these things. Why is the fourth case any different?
"Pork, potatoes, soy and vinegar"
I have been so hesitant to start our photo wall as I knew if it looked terrible, then I would be so sad! But yesterday, I bit the bullet and started.
So we began in stavanger, which you have already been hearing so much about. Esentially, Sarah got off the plane and I was asked to sub a couple of classes. We were going to go try to take class anyways, but now I was literally teaching an hour and a half after she got off the plane. So she was a sport and dragged herself to both of my classes. Best cure for jet lag they say! Well it worked for Sarah bc we started then and we basically didn’t stop.
by accident Angela had put this sentiment right near these dress forms and had a laugh.. I think it is
According to the Eastern Wisdom, there are seven cavities or empty spaces inside of the human brain. Inside of these spaces there is only Akasha or “Astral Light”. These spaces function as the connection between the being and the spiritual world. In the ancient world they called these cavities the “Chambers of the Gods”, because they believed that the human brain (and the entire human body for that matter) was a sacred temple.
Kazushige Ito, 35, New York, N.Y.
It is a brand new, giant enterprise, more like a space station than the original or last enterprise Enterprise. It's been about 4 1/2 years since the majority of old crew has moved on- they've all been promoted or retired. A few secondary characters from the original Next Generation crew remain, and/or their children.
I love words. I enjoy listening to words as much as I like reading them. I will sometimes become so wrapped up in the words while reading, I have to return to the beginning of a chapter and reread to pull out the content. I find it mind-boggling when I think of how words were created and have developed over time.
Second, they’re ridiculously sappy. I mean, they must test these ads with a whole bunch of women in focus groups until some magic number of them cry. Then they know they hit the right tone.
“Come on in!“
3. Picking up all four feet
* Combine together flour, salt, cinnamon and sugar in a mixing bowl.
(2) has been granted to them in writing by their copyright owner(s) - a copy of such permission will need to be submitted with the manuscript and artwork;
In 1998, Gulen fled to the United States from his native Turkey to avoid prosecution on charges that he was attempting to undermine Turkey’s secular government in order to establish an Islamic republic.
There were also 4 duet performances… all were good, but the Jessica/Joshua duet was outstanding. They sang Aretha Franklin and George Michaels “I Knew You Were Waiting For Me” and it was really good. She seemed to play off of his energy and soul.. and answer him each time. Really cooool. The others, Skylar/Colton, Hollie/DeAndre, and Elise/Philip were good, but not as noteworthy as the Jessica/Joshua duo.
You will notice at the lower left a fuzzy person getting ready to jump up and check it all out and generally cause as much trouble as possible.
The man in the brown suit pulled me up. I spun around, looking for the interrogation room. If I got back in there, maybe everything would go back to normal.
The format of the workshop was for Mary to give a short lecture on each template, then allow participants to fill out that template for our protagonists (with the expectation that, once we returned home, we'd go back through and fill them out for our antagonist/love interest/villain/all of the above). While we were working away at a big conference table, Mary was available in another room for individual consultation. I met with her several times and each time she'd gently guide me away from stuffing my plot full of random, unconnected events and toward creating causal links between my character, her choices and the outcomes of those choices, which in turn drove the next round of choices and outcomes.
Nancy Pelosi and John Boehner deserve each other. Sadly, we deserve neither of them. West Chester OH and San Francisco should both be ashamed and vote these two divisive, petty, vindictive losers out. But given the polarized and ideologically blind demographics of both communities, that probably won’t happen. And that, too, is sad.
Here’s what we ordered:
This bracelet matches some earrings I've got so perfectly. And I don't have many bracelets at all. Which is sad. I really need more bracelets. I used to hate them, because I can't stand that stuff annoying me while writing. But just for a few hours it's okay.
A hate crime enhancement was added to Al-Doaifi’s battery charge, which could be upgraded from a simple misdemeanor to a felony.
HAVE YOU READ “ULOMA’s RAPE?” DO SO NOW!
The 2011 Modulus Festival features modern day troubadour Gabriel Kahane, the debut of Vancouver-based cello & harp duo Couloir, Boston’s award-winning Arneis Quartet, Michael Red’s “ambient/etc.” project souns, the remarkable pianist Rachel Iwaasa, and Vancouver musical legend Veda Hille.
and she was oh so proud of them.
M1 Carbines also make great zombie rifles. Old timers will bemoan the increase in ammo prices for the caliber, but that doesn't mean the round can't be stocked.
What he wants is the transfer of real executive power from the president's office to that of the prime minister.
Folks, these parents are the victims of the liberal media's agenda, plain and simple. Constant bombardment of socialist propaganda has rendered them incapable of raising their children in a correct manner. All the talk of "understanding" and "compassion", the twin poisons of liberal socialist ideology championed by Hollywood has turned any would-be parenting skills impotent. And what's more, the commie elitist producers down at A&E are profiting off it! A&E's and their producers are directly profiting off the liberal brainwashing of America.
Let’s actually rewind and take it back to 2008, when Maximum Strength sounded like KRS-One was still capable of making the classic banger he hadn’t made in over a decade. Following his 90′s peak (his self-titled 1995 album), I Got Next (1997) was a hit but also signaled the beginning of the end. He’d go four years before releasing his next album, the decent but uneven Sneak Attack. The rest of the 2000′s saw a string of 10 lackluster albums that only hinted at his true genius (it’s hard to even fact check; his official discography differs from site to site, adding to this whole witness protection mystery). That’s right, approximately 10 albums from 2001 to 2007 (and those are the ones I’m discarding as mediocre).
Ultimately, it's probably the sort of thing that should have been kept among this trio and their other pals, and not posted online over a decade later (complete with a Geocities official site link at the end! Amazing flashback). I guess it could be worse - they could be trying to sell it to the folks behind the Decrepit Crypt set, or Troma (who sadly probably WOULD distribute it; it's no worse than some of the dreck they've put out), instead of putting it up for free. But it was a foolish decision - watch for yourself! Couldn't find a trailer (or an IMDb page) so I've embedded the thing below for your own amusement, or lack thereof.
 Able to relate to God as a Friend, as a Father, as a King and Lord as well.
6. Christmas For The Free (White, Argent) 4:13
The Dot's (short for daughter) good friend is height challenged. Even in nose-bleed high heels, she needed 3" taken off her dress. This is how I mark my hems so I can serger (in this case, a rolled hem) a straight line.
My mom mumbled over her shoulder that it felt like we were caught in the middle of a
We've been out and about over the last few weeks...went to Calke Abbey to see the wonderful gardens and the fabulous display of auriculas.
Somehow between Saturday night and Friday night I managed to take only a few photos on my phone and none on the camera. Again those days were a blur. Sunday the kids and I spent with Matt's family. (He had to fly home so he could work work work.) We did our thanksgiving and had a nice full table as usual. I love that the kids have so many cousins to play with on both sides of the family. Basically as soon as we walk in the door the kids are off and play upstairs with all kinds of fun toys. Some of which I am sure Matt played with as a child.
I believe that graffiti is a sign of the times, a sign of life, and a sign that the world isn’t everything it is cracked up to be.
But every time she turns around, Chase is there, and the closer they get, the more she fears he’ll break her heart. So when anonymous threats make it clear that someone in Redemption wants her gone, Honor is ready to oblige. Only now Chase isn’t certain he can live without her.
If haven't already gotten your ticket to winter's hottest event, here are five great reasons why you won’t want to miss out:
I can't wait to be a momma.
“It was also the first time I was really exposed to white folks. Chile, I was just as shocked as they were. But you know what’s funny? The Caucasians were actually nice, something that flew in the face of what I had been taught: that they weren’t, to say the least.”
That depends. Some are framed, others end up as hangings, stockings, or pillows. Most of my completed pieces are simply put into a portfolio or stack. I don't have enough wall space — or the desire — to display all the pieces I've finished. I rotate pieces.
Budget Analysis and Planning
Are you a hugger? This varies in families and in various regions of our country and world. In the Midwest hugging is pretty common in churches we attended. Our church in northern Pennsylvania, which we established as a young married couple, was a hugging church, even though it wasn’t common in that region. In New England we assumed an older heritage type church and the congregation wasn’t as accustomed to hugging, but that increased over time.
Just recently, my super nice cousin Brent, (elder brother of BlueLilyWendy), scanned the originals of these two pieces and gave all of my siblings a very large file of each. (Actually, access to the files on "Dropbox" if we're being perfectly accurate.)
Birthday Sprinkles
In the surrounding bushland, the Eucalypts, which drop most of their leaves during the dry season, are sprouting their new spring growth. We're starting to see some new bright green leaves on those stark white branches.
So, in summary, I can highly recommend The Making of Harry Potter for all fans of the series, or even just wannabe film makers who want to see the sheer amount of effort that goes into making a movie like these. It’s a resounding success through and through, and it will – deservedly, but begrudgingly – be lining J.K. Rowling’s pockets with extra wads of cash (not that she needs them) for a good while to come. Prepare to unleash your inner Muggle and be spellbound by this series all over again.
The city is pursuing pension reform to cut program costs. Some council members are urging quick action to avoid further delay in saving taxpayers money.
Well, as it turns out, her Social Media Plan wasn’t really written down, per se. She had been ‘keeping it in her head,’ as it was an ever-evolving plan. At least she got that part correct – social media is ever-evolving, therefore, plans must be revisited and re-written. Constantly. But still, wasn’t it good to have a loose framework to work off of for a year, or 6 months, or at least some weekly goals? Especially so your staff know what you’re thinking, what you expect from them, how they can help and/or get involved etc.? (This is why I refused to work ‘with’ her on any projects. I was more of a ‘I’ll keep you in the loop once everything is set up’-type person).
136 – Mitch Gagnon (8-1) submits David ‘Bo’ Harris (6-3-1) via guillotine choke at 2:09 of Round 1.
As part of the adaptation of my Grey Knights for their first tournament outing of 2012, my Purifier squad has got some reinforcements in the form of three psycannons, a force hammer and a force halberd. With this as an excuse, I got a box of the Grey Knights (in power armour) from Unispel a few weeks ago; and they are now finally finished and glued together.
The incident transpired in a flash, and Friedemann said Romney then led his cheering schoolmates back to his bay-windowed room in Stevens Hall.
black truffles (optional)
Conclusion: This was one hidden treat. I will certainly buy more of these sticks in the future.
Oh, what glad tidings!
Chris, one of my characters, is very dutiful. Why is he dutiful? He craves being respected, even admired. His path to being a respected man is to be dutiful. But of course the reason he wants to be respected is that he’s not very respected at all. He wants to show everyone he can be trusted, but is patronised overlooked and humiliated on a regular basis. Impulse emotions in him are shame and humiliation and inadequacy. He feels this way because he idolises his dead father, and feels himself coming up short all the time.
Assembly: When the pastry cream is cold, spread it on top of the cake (with parchment paper still underneath cake). Lift up the cake using the paper and roll it on itself. Wrap in parchment paper and refrigerate overnight or up to one day.
Happy Mother's Day and thanks for stopping by!
5. An anonymous heroin ring, fronted by a guy with a HUGE birthmark on his face and fake Russian accent! Anonymous!
I can't choose, and so I won't. Buy the book when it comes out in May.
I also found these sweet fabrics in the new fabric shop that's opened in my nearest town.
In honor of the Red Sox home opener/100th birthday/Friday the 13th/etc. I have decided to publicly declare my dismay at how this baseball season is unfolding. It’s not starting off well for newcomers Bobby Valentine and Ben Charrington. I knew things were grim when I saw Red Sox tickets available on Groupon or some other coupon site the other day – the front office is rightfully pooping their pants about Fenway’s sell-out streak, which seems about to come to a quick halt.
I hate to sound like a sap, but I really believe that everyone deserves a second chance.
I was totally giggling at myself while making this card as I couldn’t stop thinking of the movie Sleepless in Seattle! Two things I also discovered – 1. that it is extremely difficult to photograph a card which is as near as can be black and 2. you can see every speck of dust on your screen when viewing a black card! So now that I’ve cleaned up my screen, it’s hats off to Aga for not only producing an amazing design but also for taking such a fab photo of it!
TRY TO SLEEP!
So I had a hero.
So.Sad.
Note: You can use this recipe to make focaccia bread. Omit the sauce and cheese and add instead some olive oil, slices of garlic and a few sprigs of rosemary. It’s a great starter to any meal.
Guinsoo: That concludes the agenda. Guess we’re done here.
Kind Regards,
I also don't have the heart or strength in me to stand up to the angry hordes who will unleash their rage upon me when I mention what my eventual plans with this broodie are - specifically that, breeding - and I feel that writing about it will end up just making me feel rather bad about myself. Those of you from Eventing-A-Gogo may remember all the outraged backlash I received when I mentioned breeding Gogo, who was a far superior mare to Sophie if we are all to be honest with ourselves. As just a few examples, try here, and here, and here, and here, and me finally losing my marbles in frustration here. The comments on all of those posts hurt ya'll. They hurt. They really made me feel awful about myself, which is such a crying shame... I don't know any of these people in real life, why would their opinions make me feel like such a terrible person? Apparently, I am not made of as tough of stuff as I thought.
It seems that my 14lbs of baby has grown to almost 47lbs in the past year! My, oh my, where has time gone? In the past year they have gone from 8-12 feedings and diaper changes in a day, to big boys who eat all types of big people food and whole milk in a sippy cup, with only 6 diaper changes/day. They sleep from 7pm-7am without getting up and take two 1.5 hour naps each day. Colton has six teeth and Caden has two teeth. Colton can take six steps alone at a time and Caden, well, he just has no interest in walking on his own, but loves to walk holding onto furniture.
i am thankful the morning after maggie was born he started talking about all of the positive and none of the negative...how lucky we were we may never have to be empty nesters. how she would bring our family even closer together. how he would take her on father-daughter dates if she saw her sisters going on dates and she felt left out....
So I got my new license and was upset about it of course. The woman behind me said something about how her son’s name is Christopher but bc of the 9 character rule, he just gets to be “Christophe” on his license. She was a sweet lady and I smiled at her, but really all I wanted to say was, You try being an Arab in an airport with 2 IDs that don’t identically match. Seriously, you would think that in an age where security has reached body-x-ray-vision-pat-down levels that the government would want every form of ID to be as accurate and complete as possible.
Grandson (who had spent the night and the day with his assertive three year-old brother): No response, ignoring the taunting with manly resolve.
What about Snow White and Sleeping Beauty?
When I start dreaming up ideas about gardens and summertime, it's easy to get carried away and start thinking about sitting outside, right in the thick of summer, maybe it's evening and we're sitting around relaxing after dinner. The air is just starting to cool, the tiniest bit....
margin:0 auto 10px;
The film could be his own way of trying to educate the public about his life and the lives of so many others who were judged as he was at the time. Based on the context of the film it was pretty bold to try and do so in this matter. The Dream sequence in the middle of the film was very racy for the 1950s, too surreal for the time then yet too funny for the time now. Personally, I think it was trying to convey the mindset of a person within this state of confusion. The need of feeling like a woman in a world where you are already seen as a man and the fear of other finding out your secret. Even Lugosi's dialog has hidden meaning. The Dragon is also referred to as "The Green-Eyed Monster" in much of his dialog. This could be seen as a nod toward Envy. The envy in this case would be Glens own envy of women and their comforts and his desire to also have such comforts in his own life.
Johnson has played in the Masters three times, finishing tied for 30th in 2009 and tied for 38th in both 2010 and 2011.
I woke with a start from my nightmare about falling down a mineshaft, and in the dull red glow coming through our bedroom window, I saw my four-year-old sister. She’d tangled herself up in an old petticoat Mum puts on her at bedtime. We sleep on the floor and our beds are potato sacks stuffed with hay. Sara shares hers with my big sister Maria, on the other side of the room from me.
the sun glinting off a hand carved wooden boat that was made for me in Thailand
Smile! Whatever you knit, it’s beautiful and you’re proud of it; don’t be afraid to show it! Smiles are infectious, so if you love it, so will we. Well, most of us anyway!
You can see more on his website, here. And then you can click the little player below to listen to our conversation. The screaming you hear every now and then in the
Does anyone else have the feeling that their entire pregnancy occurred in a Twilight Zone? And sadly the 21-and-under-crowd probably thinks of vampires and not Alfred Hitchcock when I say that, but rest assured I'm thinking more of the portly gentleman than the sparkling ones.*
There is nothing more adorable than a little baby girl with a cute baby bow on top of her head! This classic image of a baby girl elicits adoring compliments from all who see her. The bow accentuates your daughter’s femininity and creates a soft, angelic look.
There is just one thing though. I don’t see why the “hostess” would do what she did. She seemed far more concerned with rules and regulations than the good of her passengers...
In any case, as I was reading the sample chapter of Super Sad True Love Story, I happened to think that it was ironic that one of the charms of author readings was the opportunity for booksigning. With the move toward digital by many readers, What now? I mean, the point of the reading is of course seeing the author in person and hearing him or her read aloud and perhaps answer a few questions. But it was also always fun to buy and walk away with a signed copy. It definitely gave the act of reading a certain extra frisson.
I’ve started emailing the way I blog, only this time it’s a bit more extreme. I typically write about a day or two in advance. I write a lot of half posts too. Those posts I finish a day or two before they post. My point is, I sit on a lot of stuff. It’s very rare that something gets published the same day it’s written, and I think I’ve only posted once within an hour of writing. I’m committed to blogging everyday (just not most Sundays). It’s something that I did as a challenge to myself and it morphed into something else. And while I’m not nearly at the level of some of my fellow bloggers (check out my blogroll by the way!) I still want to write my posts in a clear and concise way that’s easy to follow (which rarely happens but I try). And that usually means that I have to read them over before I publish to clarify or fix errors (though I’m far from perfect when it comes to that stuff). And I’ve noticed over the past year that sometimes when I go back a day later, it’s not quite right. Or I don’t know what I was thinking when I wrote it. Or something doesn’t fit and would do better on its own. So that’s my method. And I think it would be a good idea to apply to emails.
December has been bat-shit-crazier than the cat-shit-crazy last few months... So, I've got some extra posts to put up! 3 to be exact. So I'll be putting up one each day, and then I'll probably go into over-work-myself-into-a-coma mode, yet again.
Like the edible candy forest in “Willy Wonka and the Chocolate Factory,” a park in Seattle is designed to be eaten. But unlike the junk food forest of Wonka’s factory, which only a few children got to taste, Seattle’s edible ecosystem will be all-natural, healthy and free to the public.
+ Family
Ginger garlic paste 1 tbsp
Overall I think I did ok for my first day out. It wasn’t till the last few blocks that I really felt my legs starting to go knob. But not 100% sure if this was due to walking or the temp.
School music programs are done -- last night I had two: Kindergarten-Second Grade and Third-Fifth Grade. The kids did a great job. I love doing programs - my favorite part of teaching - but it is nice to be done too! I am ready to do something else in the classroom for the rest of the year!
Chef’s Selection of Appetizers
Aaron came and visited us since we were kind of home-bound with the two.....especially with Ethan, the trouble maker :) The cutest trouble maker you ever did see, of course!!! Binky only for bedtime? Not so much.... oops!!! He is scootin around getting into everything and totally wants to do everything on his own, but my favorite thing about him is that he will totally sit and cuddle with you while you watch a movie. He loves movies and always falls asleep in our arms. When I came home from the grocery store, I walked into the bedroom to see him and Austin snuggling. Ethan had the remote in one hand and chocolate licorice in the other while watching the Jepsons. So Austin....so cute!
MW: Not really. I think Ferrari we have seen, in the last few events, going pretty well. You never, never know. Sundays are always difficult. It is always about the tyres as you know. McLaren looked absolutely in trouble yesterday and then today they weren’t too bad at all. Very quick and they did a clean job in the pit-lane. I didn’t think we had the best day in the box today. It is not normal for our guys but you cannot be perfect all the time. That was it.
15. Retrains all judges and attorneys in Constitutional Law
after today’s work, a week later, another friday reeked from a few unexpected dilemmas. i learned from last week and projected even more positive energy. i was aware of keys, i was aware of fatigued judgments. so tonight would be different.
The card was finished off with some copper ribbon and a Nancy Watt's knot.
Eerie though the cracked streets and crumbling concrete of the old city were, the knowledge that he was alone settled Rel's nerves a bit. Hunger began to tug at his stomach. Stiff as the breeze had been on the hill above the town, the streets of old Vessit funnelled it into a wind that found its way through every piece of clothing Rel had on. Grit stung his eyes and left him spitting the earthy taste from his tongue. The mere act of looking around, trying to spot landmarks remembered from the Clearviewing that had led him here, became a trial.
There are two categories of materials you need for making compost, and for the sake of simplicity, we'll call them greens (which supply nitrogen) and browns (which supply carbon). Greens are the wet nitrogen filled materials like grass clippings, kitchen waste and fresh manures. Browns are dry things like paper, cardboard and straw. You will need 30 browns (carbon) to one green (nitrogen). Now that might sound complicated but all it means is that you need much more dry material like paper and straw than you need greens. Everything you add to the heap should be small. Chop up the scraps, cardboard etc with your garden spade before adding. The smaller it is, the faster it will decompose. BTW, if you don't have enough kitchen scraps to make a compost heap, chop up your kitchen waste and bury it in the garden. It will decompose and add to the fertility of the soil.
Let me know if you give the tutorial a try, and I'd love to see what you make with it!
Here’s one of the examples that he gives:
So what do you think? Would death be a less scary idea if you knew that you were able to spend some quality time learning the total amount of insects that you killed without even realising?
…and since I am in the mood of sharing music and I rarely settle or compromise on this subject I gladly share this band with you guys. The music they make inspires me. Brings in lots of memories from my past travelling in the States. Their beautiful cities and most of all the desert. I love this kind of rock. I love the guitar, lyrics and….drums are crazy good. Awsome voice! I can feel and almoust smell the beauty of America in this music. Because the States has so much to give when it comes to talent in music and nature. It is such an amazing country in so many ways. I am absolutely addicted to this Two songs. “last man standing” is Not one song I can listen to with myself driving a Ferrari. This really would be enhencing my Love for speed… Other than that I find it a masterpiece. Drums drive me
2. Texas 1015 yellow onions, .69/lb. at Whole Foods (through 3/30/11)
5. Oh, and you have to be a follower to enter ..... so come on join in, I love meeting new people
So, just to begin to catch you all up on the barn happenings of late:
* Technion - Israel Institute of Technology - Haifa (Israel)
Even so, it soon becomes a curiousity. OK, we get the theraputic purpose of the form of the project, but what about its content? What's with the particulars of Hogancamp's fantasy land? The documentary speaks to this just in time. It is made clear that Hogancamp requires not merely an escapist retreat in which to feel secure but also a make-believe world where he can dramatize his revenge. He must have for himself a zone wherein it is absolutely impossible to be sceptical about the bad guys being bad. They must be Pure Evil. That's right, Nazis. Hence, Hogencamp's unconscious but easily understandable need for a WWII scenario.
Bryan Minor, the proudest son to ever live.
By comparison Eugene, the Reagan-era Morning In America is not the same as the Obama-era Mourning For America.
She then married a second time, 20 years after her first marriage, to Richard Bourke, an important scion of the Bourke clan, who were nominally the overlords of the O’Malleys. The marriage was said to be so that Granuaile could expand her prestige and holdings; with the marriage she gained a castle, Rockfleet castle, as well as more harbours that would be useful to her fleet of ships. By this time, she was already powerful in her own right, and some stories suggest that the marriage only lasted a year; long enough for O’Malley to have another child, and to annex Rockfleet castle for good.
That's it ?
Add salt and pepper. I don’t add lots of salt but this soup will take more salt than you think.
Let us begin by discussing the state of man and the world before the Fall. A right understanding of this pre-Fall state is actually essential to a right understanding of the meaning of Christ’s death on the Cross. We have to understand what Adam fell from in order to understand what Christ restores us to.
Next up was “The World Changes” again with director Mervyn LeRoy. I had the pleasure of viewing this film for the first time just a few weeks ago and enjoyed it very much. It is quite similar to Cimmaron but much better in my opinion. It was the first time Muni played a character from youth to old age onscreen and its quite an amazing transformation. Overall the film seems to fall short of its grand aspirations but its still very watchable and has a fine cast.
Of rabbits, and the beasts all danced,
What are your favorite books? Share so I can add them to my list!
My ideal garden looks like a vegetable garden that’s gotten out of hand. I haven’t tended my garden properly, because I can tell there are weeds amongst my ripe fruit. I have a strawberry bed, that’s in a similar state at the moment. I’ve been limited in my mobility with my knee injury, and the weeds are about to outnumber the strawberry plants. I’ve already harvested about five gallons of berries – yes you heard me, five gallons. You’ve got to have a lot of berries to make jam, not to mention the fresh berries and strawberry shortcake.
The Avengers is everywhere. It is difficult to watch television, browse the internet, or even walk down the street without seeing some advertisement for the film. Therefore it is safe to assume that every civilized person knows of this upcoming release. Although I am intrigued about the film, I am slightly bothered by how much I am seeing of this film. I am almost positive that this film with be great summer entertainment, but is it really necessary to promote it this much? Well, back to the point of this post. Right now it is hard to say what the final product of The Avengers will be like. All we know is that this summer will be a box office showdown between Marvel’s Avengers and DC’s The Dark Knight Rises. For me personally, the final installment of Nolan’s Batman is my top pick of the summer, but I will also cheer with all the fanboys once May 4th arrives. Here in the US we still have some waiting around to do, but there are a few Avengers clips that give us a broader view of the film. Let’s take a look at some of this material:
But amazingly I felt completely different at this work event to how I would have done before I started taking Baclofen. I was SO relaxed and at ease.
Time is a sense. Time is the 6th sense.
Here are some fun ideas to spark your creativity:
2. My friends. They hold me up, they keep me sane, they love me just for who I am.
24Very truly, I tell you, unless a grain of wheat falls into the earth and dies, it remains just a single grain; but if it dies, it bears much fruit - explains St.John.
Descrição: Windows PowerShell is a command-line shell and scripting language that helps IT professionals achieve greater control and productivity. Using a new admin-focused scripting language, more than 230 standard command-line tools, and consistent syntax and utilities, Windows PowerShell allows IT professionals to more easily control system administration and accelerate automation.
- He did not threaten to take benefits away from welfare recipients
Happy Creating--
I'm not a Super Crocheter but this really was a fairly easy to create. In fact, I was seriously debating whether to finish the rabbit or to possibly alter the original goal. Do you see it? No? Need a hint? I have this niece that is completely enamored with a little white kitten? Wouldn't this be adorable as a Hello Kitty basket? I'll have to put that on my to-do list for sure. :)
Just as Douglas is about to board a train to be moved, Stan intercepts it by saying that since Connard is indeed narrowing in on Albuquerque and Douglas, a sting operation has been approved to take down Connard for good. To do so, they will infiltrate the drag queen competition and need to find a Marshal to pass off as Douglas. Mary makes the keen suggestion that possibly his “brother” could. Now we finally get to see Marshall in drag. And he gets a new nickname: Cheekbones. Love it!
How you drive. When you get behind the wheel, do you drive the way Jesus would? WHATEVER includes your driving.
Even though this is my last article for my professional experience, I hope it will not be my last article forever. I really enjoy writing for Glitterazi, and I get to write on a whole range of topics. Because Glitterazi have such a broad audience I always know that my articles will be read at least by someone.
Vuon and fellow farmer Vu Van Luan filed a lawsuit in 2009 challenging the proposed land seizure. Luan said the court had agreed to let them stay if they dropped the suit. But when they did so, the eviction order went ahead anyway.
Community is a two-way thing. We all to an extent feel the need to belong, yet we are all individuals. Too much community can be oppressive, too little leaves us isolated, vulnerable. When a way if life is broken, it is always painful, but it is part of the inevitable shifts of humanity, things go on, new structures are formed, and new ways of living become accepted. Rather than look back and wonder at once was or might have been, today in our ever more connected world, we should see what new communities we can form and perhaps how we can use them to look after each other that little bit more.
Today we are accustomed to working with companies who insist on everything being verbal so they don’t have to serve you the way they should. In contrast you need to hold them to account and so writing is the preferred way to communicate. Emails get ignored and letters rarely get a response other than the standard automated response that makes no sense and wastes more of your time.
16 Money Changes Everything
5.) “From the Crusades, to the Inquisition, to American politics--the name of Jesus had been hijacked as an ally in all kinds of power struggles. Since the beginning of time, the ignorant had always screamed the loudest, herding the unsuspecting masses and forcing them to do their bidding. They defended their worldly desires by citing Scripture they did not understand. They celebrated their intolerance as proof of their convictions. Now, after all these years, mankind had finally managed to utterly erode everything that had once been so beautiful about Jesus.” From The Lost Symbol by Dan Brown
1 tbsp Cornstarch
Once again this community has allowed the “powers that be” to shove their decisions down our throats with the hope that it will be better next time. Meanwhile our children suffer the “slings and arrows of outrageous misfortune” at the hands of political pirates who would sell our children’s futures to insure theirs.
The first page that I did in my book was taken from my favorite Florence and the Machine's song, "Dog days." There's a really great line in the song where she sings: "Happiness hit her like a bullet in the back." It's sort of how I feel when I discover I'm happy: it's such a surprise. So I did a page using that.
I have long been a fan of wooden cutting boards. It took me nearly ten years before I found one that I liked and I use it every time I cook. I propose to you plastic, glass, and (eek!) countertop cutting folks out there to put down your knives and consider the benefits of a wooden cutting board:
Personally, I feel that the terms 'right-wing' and 'left-wing' are antiquated and simply not applicable to modern politics. Take, for example, the English Defence League, who are also castigated by the media as being 'far-right' - despite the fact they have Sikh, Jewish and gay 'divisions'. Excluding their opposition to Islamic extremism, they are exponents of multiculturalism. Yet, if one looks at extremist Islamic societies like Somalia, in which a teenage rape victim was stoned to death for adultery, one has to wonder why opposition to such an illiberal ideology is considered 'far-right'? The answer is that it is simply a slur used to stigmatise those groups that are a threat to the status quo.
make sure you’re doing a job you enjoy. I know that’s not always possible. You may be stuck in a job that you hate because you need the money to live. But if you really dislike the job, don’t just put up with it, look at ways of either improving the job your doing, look for another job or retrain for a different career – something you enjoy doing. Life is too short to be wasting time and energy in a job you hate. How can you be happy and contented if you spend the majority of your time doing something you don’t
In the middle of October- Another round of IVIG treatments
Its beauty was so great, so dear,
Ug, I love bread. Eating it and making it. Problem is it is hard for me to put down. Also, have you ever looked at how many ingrediants go into processeded bread, especailly to keep it fresh. I would make bread all the time if I well - had the time. So many yeast bread recipe require long rise cycles, ug. Anyhow, adapted to the recipe below from a Weight Watchers recipe. I made a few small changes and in my version you do not need a food processor or a bread machine (but you do need a mixer) This is a super easy recipe if you are a first time bread maker.
If my insurance wouldn’t pay for it, it would cost me a mere $700.00. I decided I had no choice, but to stick with my machine.
Uh-oh (one of his first words)
Thanks Zach. You’ve laid down the gauntlet. After this visit, we will be looking at our “lil-acre’” differently.”
Why is there not one mention of the extraordinary social organizations in Israel, or the many cultural, literary and other accomplishments of Jews and Arabs in Israeli society? Why does one finish the book with the sense that Beinart, his protestations to the contrary notwithstanding, actually detests Israel? Why are assaults on Israel described in the cold language of the pathologist, while the scene with Jaber is so emotional? When Beinart mentions Gilad Schalit, this is all he has to say: “Hamas was not innocent in all this: it had abducted an Israeli soldier, Gilad Shalit, and refused to release him until Israel released Palestinians in its jails.” That’s it?! No mention of the fact that Schalit was captured inside Israeli territory? Or that Hamas never once allowed the Red Cross to visit him? Or that Schalit emerged from captivity emaciated? Or that he was held in virtual solitary confinement, with no sunlight, for five hellish years?
2. Bitter Rain
Emma is a human. Or so she thinks...
But it was the 2010 season opener that created shock waves throughout the football world. Foster carried the ball 33 times for 231 yards and 3 touchdowns. The nation asked, ‘Who is Arian Foster?’ Many in the Vol Nation asked ‘That fumbling fool rushed for 231 yards?’ By the end of the season, every football fan knew who Arian Foster was — he finished that campaign by winning the rushing title with over 1,600 yards (and over 600 receiving yards). It was the most yards from scrimmage by an undrafted player in the history of the NFL. He was a Pro Bowler. And for perhaps the first time in his football career, he was universally loved by the footballing world. But more importantly, he gained the respect of the football world.
When I was looking for a sorbet recipe, I have a few recipes I can try with very similar ingredients from French magazine and from one of my cookbooks, but I finally settle on the later, which is from this book. The picture of the sorbet looks so smooth and has a great texture, but it has some unfamiliar ingredients such as atomized glucose and sorbet stabilizer. This is one of my favorite books together with this and this. The book explains what each ingredient is and what their role is in the sorbet, love it! Luckily, one of my favorite baking sites carries it! I had to order it twice because I missed one ingredient the first time, but now that I got them, I'm all set to go.
I should be over you
It’s a question I’ve been asked about 3,000 times since moving here a year ago. And it’s something that I can easily answer. After all, they say that some moments in your life cause such intense joy, such immense pain, or such acute fear that you can always remember the precise moment in time when and where that event occurred. You can and do retell that slice of history with vivid detail, as it’s often something that is shared with kindred spirits alike. In my adult life thus far, some of those tell-tale, hallmark, and/or cliché events have included: 9/11 (2001, Women’s Studies class in Pennsylvania), the moment I realized I wanted to travel for life (2004, a bus ride in Vietnam), Obama’s presidential win (2008, a drunken hostel in Morocco), and most recently, the passing of my father (2012, a Hawaiian coffee shop in Hiroo). Last year’s tragedy in Japan is no exception.
religious scholarship – theology, philosophy of
Story is good. Story for the sake of adding story, however, may not be.
Like any sane (or should it be insane?) knitter would do...I cast on for a pair of vanilla socks in the yarn. Sad, but true. Who could blame me? I even had to go to the DENTIST yesterday morning! I wasn't going to bring a project I had to think while knitting! I do promise that NEXT FRIDAY I will have my Rhombi cardigan finished. Really this time!
Upon getting out of the pool I picked up my bag and headed into the changing room. I showered, dried off, dressed, and looked around for my hat and glasses. They weren’t there. I went back out to the pool and looked where I had set my bag down. No hat, no glasses. I looked over on the grassy lawn – ah, hat! Glasses must be nearby. I enlisted the help of a lifeguard. She and I walked the grassy lawn over, and over, and over again. I got desperate and started crawling around the grassy lawn – maybe I just couldn’t see them. The lifeguard checked the front desk but no glasses had been turned in. I got down on my knees and stuck my hand in the grimy water drains at the side of the pool just in case they somehow got blown in there. (I found a pair of goggles but no glasses.) I looked in the trashcan, several times, but I didn’t rummage through. I looked in the gravel, I looked under benches and picnic tables, I looked along the fence line. I looked farther and wider than any pair of glasses could travel on a lightly windy day. A gentleman looked with me. (He had his glasses on, so it wasn’t just a case of the blind looking for the invisible.)
I emailed myself some pictures so I could pull them up at work (on my lunch hour of course!) and post them. For whatever reason, it takes forever to upload, so here are just a few of a cuff I recently made for my friend Darcy. Her only request was purple and silver.
“He seemed to see his fellow creatures grotesquely, and he was angry with them because they were grotesque; life was a confusion of ridiculous, sordid happenings, a fit subject for laughter, and yet it made him sorrowful to laugh.”
I’d watch her kiss me, her eyes tightly closed,
- While at the mall, we saw people rushing towards the exit. Thinking probably some terror attack, we asked the security guards. they told there were brief tremors in the area. Soon we found the exit too and munched on a fresh plate of panipuris. Yum!
1 hell
30 Nov 2010, 11:00
So, back to my post title......
Roy: Regret what? I didn't say I was coming aboard.
I'm signing off for the weekend, so bye for now, and I'll be back next week with the chairs all painted and pretty. I'll also have some new artwork to share as well.
build a personal Disney itinerary for your trip complete with Pixie Dust!
You know its getting bad when you are planning beertineraries for places you may or may not visit in the next few years.
If your mind wanders away from the breath, gently bring your focus back to the tip of your nose and focus on your breathing again.
Have a great dane!! (yeah, I know...but it always makes the voices and I chuckle when I say it and people are left wondering if I said "dane" or "day")
There are hoards of catering services available to organize parties and functions. Most of these caterers offer different types of services according to the requisites of the customers. To choose the right type of caterer for your requirement, it is quite important to conduct a proper online research on the different types of caterers and their services, evaluate their samples and check previous records.
And love her again as at the start
Jesse: No, no, no…I mean, the only happiness I get is when I’m out with my son. I’ve been to marriage counseling, I’ve done things I never thought I would have to do. I lit candles, bought self-help books, lingerie…
For some reason they seemed to have gone around us here.
2 tbsp tomato paste
P.P.S. I'm CherieL over at the NaNoWriMo site, if you ever need a buddy. ;)
I can't protect every minute of her life. I can't keep bullies away from her. I can only pray that she will be strong enough to ignore them and not let any words affect her the way they affected me. I can only pray that she will be more sensitive to others and never tease or bully anyone herself. I can only pray that she knows God is with her all the time and will help her through anything.
Stray slender pine trees and fragrant flowery bushes
Arthur: Directed by Jason Winer; Starring Russell Brand, Helen Mirren, Jennifer Garner
Rubons: SU
Bruce turned this formal setting of French elegance into a dazzling mosaic of pure and merging colors that realized Cézanne's dictum that "when color is richest, form is most complete." A prototype can be found in Cézanne's "Vase of Flowers", circa 1900. However, the more immediate inspiration for the painting may have been Matisse's fusion of textiles and objects in his interiors and in his still lifes such as "Harmony in Red" of 1908-09, in which flowers, vessels and tapestry designs are interwoven in broad arabesques of equal color density.
Price: $16.99
Historically, there was a much higher correspondence between adultery and divorce then there is today. Adultery by a woman was often viewed more seriously and punished more harshly than if committed by a man. This remains the case in some countries today, including Iran and Saudi Arabia, where an adulterous wife could face a violent death. In the United States, adultery remains a crime in some states but is rarely prosecuted.
There are so many little extra surprises and so much more I could say about The Peabody House & Faryl but I feel they are better experienced than described! If you are considering a trip to Beautiful Eureka Springs-I highly recommend The Peabody so you too can experience the magic and surprises this lovely Inn has to offer. Okay Okay I will give you one hint....there may have been a towel warmer in the bathroom.....but that's all the little extras I'm sharing, you gotta go book your stay to find out what else awaits you.,...
I just returned from Orlando, where I was coaching my girls at their national competition. It was a lot of sun and fun and stress and I am so happy to be home. For two days. Tomorrow we head to Las Vegas for the weekend to celebrate the husband’s birthday with three other couples (yes, I am now old enough to take couples’ trips).
In their grape-cluster wallpaper
I swear I'll get it back to you just give me a few more days
According to Austin, he wants to be either a hobo or a bagel salesman when he grows up. Yep, that's working up to your potential, hon. Go for it.
For Creabest I made another video, how to color with red copic. I color the flower of Milton & Co.
WALK LOVE—PT 2
It's also when our 'adventure times' begin. We usually use this term to describe any situation in which we are in the boonies and we will face some type of hardship or we are doing something with a smidgeon of danger. Just a smidgeon mind you. Like if a snow machine breaks down and we have to load it on a sled and drag it home. Or on the way home we encounter a heavy snow blizzard and whiteout conditions. But sometimes we try something new and these are also 'adventure times'. Personally I think it's our way of completely refusing to become a complete adult. As long as I don't get frostbite or end up in water (which has happened once or twice) then it's always said with a grin and high five.
South Africa is one of the most criminal countries in the world, where huge, heavily-armed crime gangs rule the streets and the cops increasingly join them – where tons of illegal narcotic drugs are traded each month, where armed gangs even kidnap children from the streets to turn them into sex-slaves and ship them to brothels.
We start with the amazing, made-to-order guacamole.
Simply lift your hips up into a bridge position and then raise your heels as high as you can. Hold for the specified amount of time. If you want an additional challenge, lower and lift your heels while holding your bridge. Hello booty burn!
But that doesn't stop me from yearning for their return. You see, I may be from Detroit but my paternal grandmother was raised in Brooklyn. I vaguely remember the stories she would tell me as a very young boy. They may not have been on top during her time in this borough. (Ironically, she beat the team in moving to la-la land by a decade.) I do remember the passion she had in describing the team.
Easy Entry:
"long before lagers Germanic brewers brewed ales, which have been crafted in Germany for at least 3,000 years. Not many specific styles of beer can be traced thousands of years, however Altbier is one of them. An ale at heart, "alt" is German for "old" and helps to reflect how far back this style has been around."
About 8 years ago my eyesight started to diminish. The first thing I noticed was light sensitivity, the second was my night-time driving. I was pregnant with my youngest child and taking high dosage of hormones for medical reasons. One of the side effects of the hormones I was ingesting was slight vision loss. I spoke with my Obstetrician about my vision loss and was reassured that my vision would get better once I was able to ween myself off of the hormones.
Also. I’m not sure where this blog is going. I don’t live and breathe food anymore, and my life is widening. I’m distracted by schoolwork and stressed because of it, which might be putting a damper on my creativity. And my flat-mate messiness problem + lack of kitchen utensils is probably putting a damper on my baking/cooking. All I can say is, when I’m here I’m here, and when I’m not I’m not.
home-grown or imported and just packaged in Kin.
1) International Condemnation
Katrinna Simbaku and Jamal Revolus have been dating for almost 6 months. They first met at the Andrews University Student Center during the fall semester of 2010 and were introduced by a mutual friend. They feel that attending Andrews University has kept them in an environment free from tensions that may normally surround interracial relatioships.
If you’re a fun and fashionable woman in Cannes, you must reserve a spot on the Luxury, Fashion & Fun Shopping Tours Cannes. From luxe and teen-oriented tours to vintage and high-end tours, you will definitely have a fun afternoon shopping in Cannes and score some great Cannes shopping deals.
You never know though, he could stay in much longer or he could be a Christmas baby just not a Halloween or Thanksgiving baby! So this means no traveling for me for the rest of this pregnancy, I'll be working from home and I'm working rescheduling some of my online classes until I'm in the clear so hopefully just by a couple of weeks. We'll be working on more digital hybrid kits I think a new one posts tonight. Other than I'm taking it easy. So there is my update to my eventful week. Suprisesingly enough I'm in good spirits since the baby is still doing exceptionally well even though he is a bit smaller than he should be he is very strong. Here's to having a uneventful next four weeks!
The trip home was good fun and 3 weeks went by so so fast and I'm kicking myself for not staying on for some more time. Its strange how a country and its ways just grow on you and you head to the place you called home only to find their ways annoying. I had a couple of epiphanies after I got home. Care to read?
His face immediately changed,
Hike in groups of two or more. Make enough noise to prevent surprising a cougar.
No one thought why I was hurt,
Some weeks, each member has a project of their own or someone needs help with fitting issues or pattern alterations.
With all the new brands of hockey product continually coming out, each day we see something spectacular and rediculous. What is it this time?
Patterned Paper: Wisteria by Basic Grey
Cauliflower with scrambled eggs..A simple stri fry....This makes a great side dish with rice and roti...Here goes the recipe...
We twa hae run aboot the braes
Why am I
Two songs from Schumann’s 1849 Spanische Liebeslieder opened the programme. ‘Bedeckt mich mit Blumen’, for two sopranos, made for a slightly staid opening, but ‘Blaue Augen hat das Mädchen’, for tenor and bass, proved livelier, the captivation exerted by the girl’s blue eyes for the two protagonists readily apparent. I am sorry to say that I have never heard, or indeed played, a piece by Clara Schumann I have wished to re-encounter, and this piano Romance, op.11 no.1, offered not exception. It was actually a better piece than many I have heard from her, but it proved four-square, repetitious, and unadventurous harmonically, never rising above the generically Romantic: pleasant enough, if you like that sort of thing. Alas, I cannot report on the respective contributions of the two pianists, or indeed of particular singers, by name, since the programme gave no indication as to which was which, or to who was performing what.
No wonder then, there was this need to delay the submission of the 2010 Auditor-General’s Report to ensure that it would not completely overshadow Najib’s 2012 Budget.
#4 is actually based mostly in reality, because we do not have a lot of disposable income. But it came down to this… Should I feel guilty all the time over not taking care of the house (which I did), or should I find a solution (which I did)? Learning what I have the capacity for and what to let go of will be a lifelong process, but something had to give NOW.
I have just read the fascinating story of three lively young South African girls who went to Europe in the 1960s to spend a year travelling from place to place without spending too much money on their travels. They made use of youth hostels and managed to go from one place to another by hitching rides. Admittedly they had strict rules about hitching so they never came to any harm. Somehow I don’t think it would be possible to do the same trip today as everything is so much more expensive and the South African Rand has diminished in value. The book is well-written and extensively illustrated. I recommend this book to anyone who would like to learn more about the girls’ fascinating European adventure all those years ago. The book is available in print and Kindle editions.
The shooter turned himself in and basically took his own life as well, because he will surely - hopefully - spend the rest of his youth and all his adult years behind bars. There are those who say he shouldn't pay forever because he is just a kid. I don't feel that way, because he was obviously man enough to purchase and carry a gun, and use it on another human being, a police officer, unprovoked. So yes, I do believe this boy who wanted to be a man should forfeit the rest of his life in prison.
The book, Freedom Is More Than Just A 7-Letter Word, by Veronica: of the Chapman family, is one of the most important socio-political books you will ever read. The author has, as one person put it, ‘given us the firm foundation upon which we can build a mass movement that will sweep away the Criminal Global Elite’s influence and activities in Great Britain in a completely non-violent way.’ The plain fact of the matter is that we have all been the victims of a massive deception – but the good news is we can all do something about it.
Yelling here we are now, entertain us
ETA: one full recipe of the cake batter yielded a 1" thick, 12"-round layer. The 8" cake was made up of one full recipe of the regular lemon cake recipe (and was a good 3" tall), and the 6" cake (2-2.5" tall) was a half-recipe of the regular lemon cake.
Christmas Lights…Garland…Ornaments…Christmas Cards…Wrapping Paper…Ribbon…Stockings…Santa Hats….Figurines…Christmas Globes…Unique & One-of-a-Kind Gifts…
When I look back at Sunday strips like these examples of "Fritzi Ritz," it makes me nostalgic for the golden age of newspaper comics. Full pages. Good drawings. Nowadays I look at the Sunday funnies of my own local daily newspaper and need a magnifying glass to read them.
Baking/Cooking: …………………... 5 stars While the ingredients are cooking, you are free to do what you want!
I take over and after a while we see the doctor, who refers us to a nurse, who glues her head back together. The hairwash holiday she will be having brings a watery smile to her lips. “I didn’t cry.” she tells me. I ask why not. “I wanted the doctor to say I was very brave.” she replies. I stroke the left side of her head. “It’s alright to cry.” I tell her.
license.
on THE ROAD
Now scallop all of the circles.
STAMPS: Zazzle
